Effectiveness of neonatal pulse oximetry screening for detection of critical congenital heart disease in daily clinical routine--results from a prospective multicenter study.Pulse oximetry screening (POS) has been proposed as an effective, noninvasive, inexpensive tool allowing earlier diagnosis of critical congenital heart disease (cCHD). Our aim was to test the hypothesis that POS can reduce the diagnostic gap in cCHD in daily clinical routine in the setting of tertiary, secondary and primary care centres. We conducted a prospective multicenter trial in Saxony, Germany. POS was performed in healthy term and post-term newborns at the age of 24-72 h. If an oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) of <or=95% was measured on lower extremities and confirmed after 1 h, complete clinical examination and echocardiography were performed. POS was defined as false-negative when a diagnosis of cCHD was made after POS in the participating hospitals/at our centre. From July 2006-June 2008, 42,240 newborns from 34 institutions have been included. Seventy-two children were excluded due to prenatal diagnosis (n = 54) or clinical signs of cCHD (n = 18) before POS. Seven hundred ninety-five newborns did not receive POS, mainly due to early discharge after birth (n = 727; 91%). In 41,445 newborns, POS was performed. POS was true positive in 14, false positive in 40, true negative in 41,384 and false negative in four children (three had been excluded for violation of study protocol). Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value were 77.78%, 99.90%, 25.93% and 99.99%, respectively. With POS as an adjunct to prenatal diagnosis, physical examination and clinical observation, the percentage of newborns with late diagnosis of cCHD was 4.4%. POS can substantially reduce the postnatal diagnostic gap in cCHD, and false-positive results leading to unnecessary examinations of healthy newborns are rare. POS should be implemented in routine postnatal care.Reliability of a single pulse oximetry reading as a screening test for congenital heart disease in otherwise asymptomatic newborn infants: the importance of human factors.The use of routine pulse oximetry to detect neonates with undiagnosed congenital heart disease before nursery discharge has been studied. The reported sensitivities with asymptomatic patients have been less than expected and vary widely, bringing into question the reliability of the test. This study aimed to assess whether routine pulse oximetry contributes to identifying patients with critical congenital heart disease, and to determine the reliability of a single pulse oximeter reading for screening asymptomatic newborn infants.Between December 26, 2003 and December 31, 2005, three hospitals in west central Florida performed pulse oximetry routinely on all newborns at the time of discharge. Patients who received a diagnosis of critical congenital heart disease during the study period were identified to assess whether the pulse oximetry reading initiated their diagnosis. In one hospital, the pulse oximeter data were evaluated for reliability. Downloaded data were compared to a log compiled by the nursery personnel, first without (Phase 1) and then with (Phase 2) their knowledge and additional training. The results were characterized as reliable, probe placed but reading not verifiable, or no evidence of probe placement.Among the 7,962 infants who received oximetry testing, there were 12 postnatal diagnoses of critical congenital heart disease. None was initially identified by routine pulse oximetry. Pulse oximetry reliability improved substantially between Phases 1 and 2 (38% vs 60%; p < 0.0001). Optimal reliability (>95%) was obtained by a nurse with a licensed practical nurse degree or higher performing an assessment of at least 360 s.Routine pulse oximetry was neither reliable nor an important diagnostic tool for our cohort. Important human factors (probe placement time, oximetry training, and nursing degree) have an impact on single-determination pulse oximetry reliability. With routine surveillance and quality improvement, the reliability of this test can be increased. Future studies to determine the effectiveness of pulse oximetry screening for the diagnosis of congenital heart disease in the asymptomatic newborn population must address these factors. Until such a study demonstrates acceptable sensitivity and clinical value, universal screening should not be instituted.Pulse Oximetry Screening for Critical Congenital Heart Disease after Home Birth and Early Discharge.To assess the feasibility of pulse oximetry (PO) screening in settings with home births and very early discharge. We assessed this with an adapted protocol in The Netherlands.PO screening was performed in the Leiden region in hospitals and by community midwives. Measurements were taken ≥ 1 hour after birth and on day 2 or 3 during the midwife visit. Primary outcome was the percentage of screened infants with parental consent. The time point of screening, oxygen saturation, false positive (FP) screenings, critical congenital heart defects (CCHDs), and other detected pathology were registered.In a 1-year period, 3625 eligible infants were born. Parents of 491 infants were not approached for consent, and 44 refused the screening. PO screening was performed in 3059/3090 (99%) infants with obtained consent. Median (IQR) time points of the first and second screening were 1.8 (1.3-2.8) and 37 (27-47) hours after birth. In 394 infants with screening within 1 hour after birth, the median pre- and postductal oxygen saturations were 99% (98%-100%) and 99% (97%-100%). No CCHD was detected. The FP prevalence was 1.0% overall (0.6% in the first hours after birth). After referral, important noncritical cardiac and other noncardiac pathology was found in 62% of the FP screenings.PO screening for CCHD is feasible after home births and very early discharge from hospital. Important neonatal pathology was detected at an early stage, potentially increasing the safety of home births and early discharge policy.Pulse oximetry screening at 4 hours of age to detect critical congenital heart defects.The purpose of this prospective study was to assess the feasibility and reliability of pulse oximetry screening to detect critical congenital heart defects in a newborn nursery.The study was performed in a large urban hospital with an exclusively inborn population. Stable neonates who had a gestational age of >or=35 weeks and birth weight of >or=2100 g and in whom a critical congenital heart defect was not suspected were admitted to the newborn nursery. When the 4-hour pulse oximetry reading was <96%, pulse oximetry was repeated at discharge, and when the pulse oximetry reading remained at persistently <96%, echocardiography was performed.Of 15299 admissions to newborn nursery during the 12-month study period, 15233 (99.6%) neonates were screened with 4-hour pulse oximetry. Pulse oximetry readings were >or=96% for 14374 (94.4%) neonates; 77 were subsequently evaluated before discharge for cardiac defects on the basis of clinical examination. Seventy-six were normal, and 1 had tetralogy of Fallot with discontinuous pulmonary arteries. Pulse oximetry readings at 4 hours were <96% in 859 (5.6%); 768 were rescreened at discharge, and 767 neonates had a pulse oximetry reading at >or=96%. One neonate had persistently low pulse oximetry at discharge; echocardiography was normal. Although 3 neonates with a critical congenital heart defect had a 4-hour pulse oximetry reading of <96%, all developed signs and/or symptoms of a cardiac defect and received a diagnosis on the basis of clinical findings, not screening results.All neonates with a critical congenital heart defect were detected clinically, and no cases of critical congenital heart defect were detected by pulse oximetry screening. These results indicate that pulse oximetry screening does not improve detection of critical congenital heart defects above and beyond clinical observation and assessment. Our findings do not support a recommendation for routine pulse oximetry screening in seemingly healthy neonates.First day of life pulse oximetry screening to detect congenital heart defects.To evaluate the efficacy of first day of life pulse oximetry screening to detect congenital heart defects (CHDs).We performed a population-based prospective multicenter study of postductal (foot) arterial oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) in apparently healthy newborns after transfer from the delivery suite to the nursery. SpO(2) < 95% led to further diagnostic evaluations. Of 57,959 live births, 50,008 (86%) were screened. In the screened population, 35 CHDs were [corrected] classified as critical (ductus dependent, cyanotic). CHDs were prospectively registered and diagnosed in 658/57,959 (1.1%) [corrected]Of the infants screened, 324 (0.6%) failed the test. Of these, 43 (13%) had CHDs (27 critical), and 134 (41%) had pulmonary diseases or other disorders. The remaining 147 infants (45%) were healthy with transitional circulation. The median age for babies with CHDs at failing the test was 6 hours (range, 1-21 hours). For identifying critical CHDs, the pulse oximetry screening had a sensitivity rate of 77.1% (95% CI, 59.4-89.0), specificity rate of 99.4% (95% CI, 99.3-99.5), and a false-positive rate of 0.6% (95% CI, 0.5-0.7).Early pulse oximetry screening promotes early detection of critical CHDs and other potentially severe diseases. The sensitivity rate for detecting critical CHDs is high, and the false-positive rate is low.Early screening for critical congenital heart defects in asymptomatic newborns in Bursa province.In this study, pulse oximetry screening results in the early diagnosis of critical congenital heart diseases (CCHD) will be evaluated.Eight-thousand two-hundred and eight of 10,200 newborns born between January 2014 and December 2014 were screened using pulse oximetry for the diagnosis of CCHD. Screening test was considered to be positive in the newborns whose saturation after 24 h from the birth with pulse oximetry was ≤ 95% and/or in the newborns who had a difference of ≥ 3% between the lower and right upper extremity.Incidence of CCHD was 1 per 1000 live births. Coarctation of the aorta was the most commonly determined CCHD. Sensitivity, specificity, false negative rate and false positive rate of pulse oximetry in the diagnosis of CCHD were 60%, 99.8%, 40% and 0.12%, respectively. Seventy-five percent of the newborns who had a false negative diagnosis with pulse oximetry had coarctation of the aorta. Coarctation of the aorta was determined at a rate of 20% using CCHD screening.The diagnosis of coarctation of the aorta is missed in the newborns screened with pulse oximetry in the first 24-48 h after birth. Screening with pulse oximetry should be repeated for early diagnosis of coarctation of the aorta.Routine pulse oximetry in the asymptomatic newborn.To assess the effect of routine measurement of postductal oxygen saturation as an adjunct to routine clinical examination in the asymptomatic newborn.Prospective study in a district general hospital.All 6166 infants inborn between 1 April 1999 and 31 March 2001.Oxygen saturation was measured over two minutes, after the age of 2 hours and before discharge, in one foot of all babies not admitted directly to the neonatal unit. Babies with fractional (as opposed to functional) oxygen saturation (SaO(2)) below 95% were examined by the midwife. If this examination was abnormal or if normal but further measurements were below 95%, an echocardiogram was performed. All babies with cardiac malformations diagnosed by 1 year of age were identified from databases maintained at the regional cardiology referral unit and the regional congenital malformation survey.Measurements were made in 98% of eligible babies. A fractional SaO(2) less than 95% was found in 5% but persisted in only 1%. Structural cardiac malformations were found in 50 (8.1/1000), 26 of whom had isolated ventricular septal defects. Of the remaining 24 with other cardiac malformations, attention was first drawn to six by low SaO(2), and four more, first noticed for other reasons, also had low SaO(2). Low SaO(2) also first drew attention to 13 other babies ill for other reasons.Newborn babies with important cardiac malformations are often asymptomatic initially and the yield from clinical examination is poor. Measuring postductal saturation routinely in newborn babies before discharge is easy and can alert staff to ill babies.Pulse oximetry screening as a complementary strategy to detect critical congenital heart defects.To compare strategies with and without first-day of life pulse oximetry screening to detect critical congenital heart defects (CCHDs).Population based study including all live born infants in Norway in 2005 and 2006 (n = 116 057). Postductal (foot) arterial oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) was measured in apparently healthy newborns after transferral to the nursery, with SpO(2) < 95% as cut-off point. Out of 57 959 live births in the hospitals performing pulse oximetry screening, 50 008 (86%) were screened.A total of 136 CCHDs (1.2 per 1000) were diagnosed, 38 (28%) of these prenatally. Of the CCHDs detected after birth, 44/50 (88%) were detected before discharge in the population offered pulse oximetry screening (25 by pulse oximetry), compared to 37/48 (77%) in the non-screened population (p = 0.15). Median times for diagnosing CCHDs in-hospital before discharge were 6 and 16 h after birth respectively (p < 0.0001). In the screened population 6/50 (12%) CCHDs were missed and recognized after discharge because of symptoms. Two of the six missed cases failed the pulse oximetry screening, but were overlooked (echocardiography not performed before discharge). If these cases had been recognized, 4/50 (8%) would have been missed compared to 11/48 (23%) in the non-screened population (p = 0.05). Of the cases missed, 14/17 (82%) had left-sided obstructive lesions.First-day of life pulse oximetry screening provides early in-hospital detection of CCHDs and may reduce the number missed and diagnosed after discharge.Pulse oximetry as a screening test for congenital heart defects in newborn infants: a test accuracy study with evaluation of acceptability and cost-effectiveness.Screening for congenital heart defects (CHDs) relies on antenatal ultrasound and postnatal clinical examination; however, life-threatening defects often go undetected.To determine the accuracy, acceptability and cost-effectiveness of pulse oximetry as a screening test for CHDs in newborn infants.A test accuracy study determined the accuracy of pulse oximetry. Acceptability of testing to parents was evaluated through a questionnaire, and to staff through focus groups. A decision-analytic model was constructed to assess cost-effectiveness.Six UK maternity units.These were 20,055 asymptomatic newborns at ≥ 35 weeks' gestation, their mothers and health-care staff.Pulse oximetry was performed prior to discharge from hospital and the results of this index test were compared with a composite reference standard (echocardiography, clinical follow-up and follow-up through interrogation of clinical databases).Detection of major CHDs - defined as causing death or requiring invasive intervention up to 12 months of age (subdivided into critical CHDs causing death or intervention before 28 days, and serious CHDs causing death or intervention between 1 and 12 months of age); acceptability of testing to parents and staff; and the cost-effectiveness in terms of cost per timely diagnosis.Fifty-three of the 20,055 babies screened had a major CHD (24 critical and 29 serious), a prevalence of 2.6 per 1000 live births. Pulse oximetry had a sensitivity of 75.0% [95% confidence interval (CI) 53.3% to 90.2%] for critical cases and 49.1% (95% CI 35.1% to 63.2%) for all major CHDs. When 23 cases were excluded, in which a CHD was already suspected following antenatal ultrasound, pulse oximetry had a sensitivity of 58.3% (95% CI 27.7% to 84.8%) for critical cases (12 babies) and 28.6% (95% CI 14.6% to 46.3%) for all major CHDs (35 babies). False-positive (FP) results occurred in 1 in 119 babies (0.84%) without major CHDs (specificity 99.2%, 95% CI 99.0% to 99.3%). However, of the 169 FPs, there were six cases of significant but not major CHDs and 40 cases of respiratory or infective illness requiring medical intervention. The prevalence of major CHDs in babies with normal pulse oximetry was 1.4 (95% CI 0.9 to 2.0) per 1000 live births, as 27 babies with major CHDs (6 critical and 21 serious) were missed. Parent and staff participants were predominantly satisfied with screening, perceiving it as an important test to detect ill babies. There was no evidence that mothers given FP results were more anxious after participating than those given true-negative results, although they were less satisfied with the test. White British/Irish mothers were more likely to participate in the study, and were less anxious and more satisfied than those of other ethnicities. The incremental cost-effectiveness ratio of pulse oximetry plus clinical examination compared with examination alone is approximately £24,900 per timely diagnosis in a population in which antenatal screening for CHDs already exists.Pulse oximetry is a simple, safe, feasible test that is acceptable to parents and staff and adds value to existing screening. It is likely to identify cases of critical CHDs that would otherwise go undetected. It is also likely to be cost-effective given current acceptable thresholds. The detection of other pathologies, such as significant CHDs and respiratory and infective illnesses, is an additional advantage. Other pulse oximetry techniques, such as perfusion index, may enhance detection of aortic obstructive lesions.The National Institute for Health Research Health Technology programme.Pulse oximetry as a screening tool for detecting major congenital heart defects in Indian newborns.To evaluate the use of pulse oximetry as a screening tool for detecting major congenital heart defects (CHDs) in Indian newborns.Cross-sectional observational study.In a community hospital of north India, babies born during a specific 8 h period of the day were recruited over a period of 3 years. Newborns with incomplete documentation were excluded.Routine clinical examination, pulse oximetry and bedside echocardiography.Any abnormalities in clinical examination and pulse oximetry were recorded. CHDs were diagnosed using bedside echocardiography. Accuracy of pulse oximetry, clinical examination and their combination for detecting major CHDs was calculated.Among the 19 009 newborns screened, 70 had major CHDs at birth (44 serious, 26 critical). Pulse oximetry detected 39 major (sensitivity 55.7%, 95% CI 44.1% to 66.8%; specificity 68.3%, 67.6% to 68.9%) and 22 critical CHDs (sensitivity 84.6%, 66.5% to 93.9%; specificity 68.3%, 67.6% to 68.9%). Addition of pulse oximetry to clinical examination significantly improved sensitivity for major CHDs (35.7% (25.5% to 47.4%) to 75.7% (64.5% to 85.3%), p<0.01) and critical CHDs (11.5% (4.0% to 29.0%) to 84.6% (66.5% to 93.9%), p<0.01).Pulse oximetry is a sensitive screening tool for detecting major CHDs in Indian newborns. It adds significant value to the current practice of using clinical examination as a sole screening tool for detecting major CHDs. However, specificity of pulse oximetry was much lower in our study. Possible reasons for low specificity could be non-repetition of pulse oximetry in newborns with initial lower saturations, high prevalence of infections and respiratory issues in our cohort and use of non-motion tolerant oximeter.Effectiveness of pulse-oximetry in addition to routine neonatal examination in detection of congenital heart disease in asymptomatic newborns.To assess the feasibility and effectiveness of pulse-oximetry as a screening tool in the detection of critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) in newborns.Post-natal babies born between 01/01/2007-31/12/2009 were eligible. Post-ductal pulse-oximetry was performed using Nellcor® NPB 40 pulse oximeter with reusable OXI-A/N saturation probe. Saturations ≥95% were deemed normal. If saturations were <95%, an echocardiogram was done. The regional paediatric cardiology database and death records identified babies later diagnosed with CCHD.6329/9613 eligible babies were studied and pulse-oximetry was performed at a mean age of 28 hours (range 6-72 hours). Fourteen babies had saturations <95%. CCHD was diagnosed in 7/14 babies; 4/7 had no clinical signs. Of the remaining 7 babies, 3 had non-critical but significant CHD and 4 had an undiagnosed respiratory illness or sepsis. All babies with low saturations had identifiable pathologies. One baby with normal saturations was later diagnosed with transposition of the great arteries. The sensitivity and specificity of identifying an unwell baby was 93.3% and 100% respectively; the sensitivity and specificity of identifying CCHD was 87.5% and 99.8% respectively. Clinical examination alone would have missed 4/7 (57%) of these.Pulse-oximetry is safe, acceptable, non-invasive and effective. Our study supports the routine use of pulse oximetry as part of the newborn check.Development of a Newborn Screening Program for Critical Congenital Heart Disease (CCHD) in Taipei.Early detection of critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) can significantly reduce morbidity and mortality among newborns. We investigate the feasibility of implementing a community-based newborn CCHD screening program in Taipei.Twelve birthing facilities in Taipei participated in a trial screening program between October 1, 2013, and March 31, 2014. Newborns underwent pulse oximetry at 24-36 h old, with probes attached to the right hand and one lower limb. Any screening saturation ≥95% in either extremity, with an absolute difference of ≤3% between the right hand and foot, was accepted as a screening pass. A screening result was considered as a fail if the oxygen saturation was <95% at either probe site, on 3 separate occasions, each separated by 30 min or the first result was <95% at either probe site, and any subsequent oxygen saturation measurement was <90%. Public health nurses would follow up all missed or refused cases.Of the 6,387 live births, 6,296 newborns (coverage rate: 6,296/6,387 = 98.6%) underwent appropriate pulse oximetry screening. Sixteen newborns (0.25%) were reported to have a failed screening result. Five of these screen positive newborns were confirmed with CCHD; two of them were diagnosed solely attributed to the failed screening results. The false-positive rate was 0.18%. Implementing a 6-month screening program for CCHD produced good case detection rate, while using efficient screening and referral systems.This program was successful in integrating screening, referral and public health tracking systems. The protocol outlined in this report could provide a community-based model for worldwide implementation.Implementation of critical congenital heart disease screening in Minnesota.To assess the level of preparedness and resources needed in Minnesota for the implementation of newborn screening for critical congenital heart diseases (CCHDs).A cross sectional survey of all birth centers in Minnesota was performed to assess the capacity to deliver care essential for the CCHD screening program. Compliance with the screening algorithm, nursing workload, and cost were assessed by using a pilot program implemented in 6 normal newborn nurseries.Ninety-one of 99 eligible centers participated in the survey and 90 reported the ability to screen newborns in accordance with recommendations. Only 22 centers, with 63% of births, had access to echocardiography and routinely stocked prostaglandins for neonatal use. Our pilot study screened 7549 newborns with 6 failed screens and 1 CCHD diagnosis. Two of the failed screens were due to misinterpretation of the algorithm, 1 failed screen was not reported, and 4 failed screens were not recognized. Repeated screens were required for 115 newborns, with 29% of retesting due to misinterpretation of the algorithm. The mean nursing time required was 5.5 minutes, and the cost was $5.10 per screen.In Minnesota, two-thirds of newborns are born in centers with resources for initial diagnosis and management of CCHD. Implementation of a pilot screening program demonstrated minimal increase in nursing workload, but identified problems with interpretation of the algorithm and data reporting. This pilot project suggests the need for simplification of the algorithm, additional training of health care providers, and development of a centralized reporting mechanism.Evaluation of a Screening Program to Detect Critical Congenital Heart Defects in Newborns.To report the results of and to identify problems with implementing a screening program to detect critical congenital heart defects (CCHDs) in newborns by using differential pulse oximetry (POx).Charts of all live-born infants from 4 Yale-New Haven health system hospitals in Connecticut between January 1 and December 31, 2014, were reviewed.Of 10 589 newborns, 171 (1.6%) underwent an echocardiogram before screening, 10 320 (97.5%) were screened by POx, and 98 (0.9%) were not screened. Thirteen newborns (0.1%) were diagnosed with a CCHD. No infants with CCHDs were identified through POx screening (POxS) alone. Eleven (85%) were already suspected of having a CCHD lesion on the basis of prenatal ultrasound, 1 (8%) was diagnosed because of clinical concern before undergoing screening, and 1 (8%) had a false-negative screening result, but a CCHD was identified after an echocardiogram was performed because a murmur was heard. Four infants with a positive POx screen showed noncritical cardiac lesions by echocardiogram. The majority of infants were screened within the recommended 24 to 72 hours of age interval and had POx screens that were interpreted and documented correctly. Of 10 316 infants with negative POx screens, 52.1% were still in the Yale-New Haven Hospital health system at 1 year of age and no CCHD lesions were listed in their charts.Although a CCHD screening program was effectively implemented, perhaps because most children with a CCHD (85%) were detected antenatally by ultrasound, in our hospital system POxS did not lead to a substantial increase in the early identification of CCHDs.Oxygen saturation as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease: a preliminary study.The aim of this study was to assess the utility of arm and leg oxygen saturation as a candidate screening test for the early detection of ductal-dependent left heart obstructive disease. We measured arm and leg oxygen saturation in 2876 newborns admitted to well baby nurseries and 32 newborns with congenital heart disease. Fifty-seven newborns in the well baby nurseries (0.02%) had an abnormal test (leg saturation less than 92% in room air or 7% lower saturation in the leg than in the arm). Four of the 57 had critical congenital heart disease, including 1 with coarctation of the aorta. Of the 32 newborns with congenital heart disease, 11/13 (85%) with left heart obstructive disease had abnormal oxygen saturation tests, as did 15/19 (79%) with other forms of congenital heart disease. Pulse oximetry deserves further study as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease.The impact and efficacy of routine pulse oximetry screening for CHD in a local hospital.The objective of this study was to evaluate the impact and efficacy of pulse oximetry screening for CHD in a level-two neonatal unit without on-site access to paediatric echocardiography.All neonatal unit admissions between 1 September, 2011 and 31 August, 2013 were reviewed to determine the outcomes of newborns identified by pulse oximetry screening. Record linkage with the National Congenital Heart Disease Audit allowed follow-up of newborns with a negative screening result.There were 11,233 live births during the study period, with 973 neonatal unit admissions unrelated to pulse oximetry screening. From the remaining screening population of 10,260 newborns, 23 were admitted on the basis of a screen-positive result; three of the 23 patients went on to have urgent echocardiograms, and two were found to have critical CHD. In the 21 newborns without critical CHD, an alternative diagnosis was made in 16 cases. Record linkage with the National Congenital Heart Disease Audit indicated that no newborns born in the hospital during the study period received surgery for critical CHD following negative screening. The estimated sensitivity of screening was 100% (95% confidence interval 15.81-100%) and specificity was 99.80% (95% confidence interval 99.69-99.87%), with a false-positive rate of 0.20% (95% confidence interval 0.13-0.31%).The introduction of pulse oximetry screening to a hospital where paediatric echocardiography services are not available is practical, results in very few referrals to the regional paediatric cardiology centre, and detects cases of CHD that would otherwise go undiagnosed. Record linkage with a national CHD database provides a straightforward method for tracking cases of CHD that may have been missed by screening.The impact of routine predischarge pulse oximetry screening in a regional neonatal unit.(i) To evaluate the impact of routine early pulse oximetry screening on the rate of unexpected neonatal unit (NNU) admissions and the need for echocardiography. (ii) To review the outcomes of babies admitted as a result of a positive pulse oximetry screening test.Retrospective review over a 40-month period.Level 3 NNU.All babies admitted as a result of positive pulse oximetry screening.Indication for admission, clinical diagnosis and management were collated. Results 3552 babies were admitted during the study period. Of these, 1651 were unexpected admissions and 208/1651 (12.6%) were as a result of positive pulse oximetry screening. 165/208 babies (79%) had a significant clinical condition which required further intervention including 17 with congenital heart defect (CHD) (nine critical), 55 with pneumonia, 30 with sepsis and 12 with pulmonary hypertension. No baby died or collapsed on the postnatal ward during the study period. 61/208 babies (29%) had echocardiography and CHD was detected in 28%. Conclusions Routine use of pulse oximetry screening identifies babies with CHD and other illnesses, which, if not identified early could potentially lead to postnatal collapse. It does not appear to overload clinical services, resulting in appropriate admission in the majority and a modest increase in the number of echocardiograms performed.Early screening for critical congenital heart defects in asymptomatic newborns in Mazovia province: experience of the POLKARD pulse oximetry programme 2006-2008 in Poland.Early diagnosis of critical congenital heart defects (CCHD) may be missed both during prenatal echocardiography and the short stay in the neonatal nursery, leading to circulatory collapse or death of the newborn before readmission to hospital.To assess the usefulness of pulse oximetry as a screening test in early diagnosis of CCHD in newborns.A prospective screening pulse oximetry test was conducted in 51 neonatal units in the Mazovia province of Poland as part of the POLKARD 2006-2008 programme between 16 January, 2007 and 31 January, 2008. Newborns with no circulatory symptoms or coexisting diseases, and no prenatal diagnosis, were enrolled. The test was performed between the 2(nd) and 24(th) hours of life in stable newborns. A double arterial oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) reading < 95% on a lower extremity led to cardiovascular evaluation and echocardiography.From a population of 52,993 newborns (14.2% of births in Poland), a group of 51,698 asymptomatic infants was isolated. CCHD was diagnosed solely by pulse oximetry in 15 newborns, which constituted 18.3% of all CCHD; 14 (0.026%) false positives were obtained and there were four false negative results. The sensitivity of the test was 78.9% and specificity 99.9%. The positive predictive value was 51.7% and negative 99.9%.Pulse oximetry fulfilling the screening test criteria, performed on a large population of newborns in Poland, proved useful in supporting prenatal diagnostics and postnatal physical examination in the early detection of initially asymptomatic CCHD. Good sensitivity and specificity results of the pulse oximetry test have allowed it to be recommended for use in neonatal units nationwide.Impact of pulse oximetry screening on the detection of duct dependent congenital heart disease: a Swedish prospective screening study in 39,821 newborns.To evaluate the use of pulse oximetry to screen for early detection of life threatening congenital heart disease.Prospective screening study with a new generation pulse oximeter before discharge from well baby nurseries in West Götaland. Cohort study comparing the detection rate of duct dependent circulation in West Götaland with that in other regions not using pulse oximetry screening. Deaths at home with undetected duct dependent circulation were included.All 5 maternity units in West Götaland and the supraregional referral centre for neonatal cardiac surgery.39,821 screened babies born between 1 July 2004 and 31 March 2007. Total duct dependent circulation cohorts: West Götaland n=60, other referring regions n=100.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and likelihood ratio for pulse oximetry screening and for neonatal physical examination alone.In West Götaland 29 babies in well baby nurseries had duct dependent circulation undetected before neonatal discharge examination. In 13 cases, pulse oximetry showed oxygen saturations <or=90%, and (in accordance with protocol) clinical staff were immediately told of the results. Of the remaining 16 cases, physical examination alone detected 10 (63%). Combining physical examination with pulse oximetry screening had a sensitivity of 24/29 (82.8% (95% CI 64.2% to 95.2%)) and detected 100% of the babies with duct dependent lung circulation. Five cases were missed (all with aortic arch obstruction). False positive rate with pulse oximetry was substantially lower than that with physical examination alone (69/39 821 (0.17%) v 729/38 413 (1.90%), P<0.0001), and 31/69 of the "false positive" cases with pulse oximetry had other pathology. Thus, referral of all cases with positive oximetry results for echocardiography resulted in only 2.3 echocardiograms with normal cardiac findings for every true positive case of duct dependent circulation. In the cohort study, the risk of leaving hospital with undiagnosed duct dependent circulation was 28/100 (28%) in other referring regions versus 5/60 (8%) in West Götaland (P=0.0025, relative risk 3.36 (95% CI 1.37 to 8.24)). In the other referring regions 11/25 (44%) of babies with transposition of the great arteries left hospital undiagnosed versus 0/18 in West Götaland (P=0.0010), and severe acidosis at diagnosis was more common (33/100 (33%) v 7/60 (12%), P=0.0025, relative risk 2.8 (1.3 to 6.0)). Excluding premature babies and Norwood surgery, babies discharged without diagnosis had higher mortality than those diagnosed in hospital (4/27 (18%) v 1/110 (0.9%), P=0.0054). No baby died from undiagnosed duct dependent circulation in West Götaland versus five babies from the other referring regions.Introducing pulse oximetry screening before discharge improved total detection rate of duct dependent circulation to 92%. Such screening seems cost neutral in the short term, but the probable prevention of neurological morbidity and reduced need for preoperative neonatal intensive care suggest that such screening will be cost effective long term.Indications and limitations for a neonatal pulse oximetry screening of critical congenital heart disease.Critical congenital cardiovascular malformations (CCVMs) require surgical correction during the first month of life, physical examination is unable to detect >50% of affected infants. An oximetry screening has been previously proposed. Our aim was to verify the usefulness and consistency of a pulse oximetry screening for early detection of CCVMs in a small size nursery.A single determination of SpO2 was performed on 5292 consecutive apparently healthy newborns, discharged from nursery at a median age of 72 h during the period May 1, 2000 and November 30, 2004. Infants showing signs of congenital heart disease before the screening and those with a prenatal diagnosis were excluded. Cardiac ultrasound was performed on all infants with SpO2< or =95% at >24 h. The accuracy of the screening in identifying CCVMs was assessed by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) curves analysis.We found 2 (0.038%) true positives, 1 (0.019%) false negative, 1 (0.019%) false positive, and 5288 (99.92%) true negatives. Prevalence of critical CCVMs was 1 in 1764. Clinical follow-up showed no evidence of CCVMs in the negative cases. A pulse-oximetry cut-off value of < or =95% showed 66.7% sensitivity (95% CI: 11.6-94.5), 100% specificity (95% CI: 99.9-100.0), 50% positive predictive value, 100% negative predictive value and AUC of 0.833 (standard error: 0.145) (95% CI: 0.823 to 0.843) in identifying CCVMs.Our findings indicate that pulse oximetry is a non-invasive and specific screening tool for an early detection of CCVMs, and is easily applicable to a small size nursery.Post-implementation review of pulse oximetry screening of well newborns in an Australian tertiary maternity hospital.Despite there being evidence that pulse oximetry screening is better than clinical examination alone in early detection of CHD, implementation has been slow. The aim of this paper was to evaluate the practice after its implementation into routine care at Royal Prince Alfred Hospital in 2008.A single pulse oximetry measurement was incorporated in the routine discharge newborn examination or, with early discharge, as a part of the Midwife Discharge Support Programme. An oxygen saturation level greater than or equal to 95% was considered normal, and a level less than 95%, confirmed on a repeat measure, triggered a review and examination by a consultant neonatal paediatrician. The saturation levels were recorded in the hospital database. Ascertainment of major CHD requiring surgery in the first 12 months was performed by searching the cardiac surgery database of the Heart Centre for Children.A total of 18 801 babies were screened over a 42-month period. Of these, four babies with major CHD were diagnosed prior to discharge with the main clinical alert resulting from routine pulse oximetry screening (true positive). Of the 11 cases with saturation <95% but no CHD (false positive cases), six had respiratory pathology. One baby with normal saturation level needed surgery in the first year for a large ventricular septal defect (false negative). The false positive rate of pulse oximetry screening for CHD was 0.13% with sensitivity 80%, specificity of 99.8%, a positive predictive value of 13.3% and a negative predictive value of 99.9%. Nine additional echocardiogram were required over 42 months.These post-implementation data confirm that pulse oximetry screening increases early diagnosis of major CHD as well as other important pathology with a very low false positive rate and minimal requirement for extra echocardiograms. Pulse oximetry screening of apparently well newborns should become a standard of care.The reliability of a single pulse oximetry reading as a screening test for congenital heart disease in otherwise asymptomatic newborn infants.Routine pulse oximetry has been studied to detect children with otherwise undiagnosed congenital heart disease prior to nursery discharge. The reported sensitivities in asymptomatic patients have been less than expected and vary widely, bringing into question the reliability of the test. The purpose of this study was to assess whether routine pulse oximetry contributes to identifying patients with critical congenital heart disease and to determine the reliability of a single pulse oximeter reading in screening asymptomatic newborn infants. Between December 26, 2003, and December 31, 2005, three hospitals in west central Florida performed a pulse oximetry routinely on all newborns at the time of discharge. Patients diagnosed with critical congenital heart disease during the study period were identified to assess whether the pulse oximetry reading initiated their diagnosis. In one hospital, the pulse oximeter data were evaluated for reliability. Downloaded data were compared to a log compiled by the nursery personnel, first without (phase 1) and then with (phase 2) their knowledge and additional training. Results were characterized as reliable, probe placed but reading not verifiable, or no evidence of probe placement. Of the 7962 infants who received oximetry testing, there were 12 postnatal diagnoses of critical congenital heart disease. None was initially identified by routine pulse oximetry. Pulse oximetry reliability improved substantially between phase 1 and phase 2 (38 v. 60%, p < 0.0001). Optimal reliability (>95%) was obtained by a nurse with a degree of LPN or higher performing an assessment of at least 360 seconds. Routine pulse oximetry was neither reliable nor an important diagnostic tool in our cohort. Important human factors (probe placement time, oximetry training, and nursing degree) impact single determination pulse oximetry reliability. With routine surveillance and quality improvement, the reliability of this test can be increased. Future studies to determine the effectiveness of pulse oximetry screening for the diagnosis of congenital heart disease in the asymptomatic newborn population must address these factors. Until such a study demonstrates acceptable sensitivity and clinical value, universal screening should not be instituted.The use of pulse oximetry to detect congenital heart disease.To evaluate whether pulse oximetry can be used as a screening test to detect congenital heart disease (CHD) in otherwise well newborns before nursery discharge.Births at Lakeland Regional Medical Center (LRMC) who met inclusion criteria, had a single pulse oximeter reading before discharge. A normal reading was considered to be >94%. Abnormal readings were repeated on a different extremity and if still abnormal, an echocardiography was performed. The number of children with CHD and the number of echocardiograms were compared with the previous year at LRMC.There were 2114 infants enrolled, 88 echocardiograms (3.8%) were performed, and 43 were abnormal (yield = 48.9%), of which 12 required management (13.6%). The control group consisted of 2851 births, producing 108 echocardiograms (3.8%), 42 of which were abnormal (38.9%), and 13 required management (12.0%). No comparisons were significant. During both years, 3 children with cyanotic CHD were born. Routine pulse oximetry failed to detect a child with total anomalous pulmonary venous return. Not a single normal echocardiogram was generated by the study.Routine pulse oximetry was nearly 100% specific for detecting cyanotic CHD; as a result there was no increase in the number of echocardiograms. Routine pulse oximetry did detect a child who might not have been detected otherwise but failed to detect one that should have been detected.Effectiveness of pulse oximetry screening for congenital heart disease in asymptomatic newborns.To determine the sensitivity, specificity, predictive value, and accuracy of a program of pulse oximetry screening of asymptomatic newborns for critical congenital cardiovascular malformation (CCVM).Pulse oximetry was performed on asymptomatic newborns in the well-infant nurseries of 2 hospitals. Cardiac ultrasound was performed on infants with positive screens (saturation <or=95% at >24 hours). Data regarding true and false positives as well as negatives were collected and analyzed.Oximetry was performed on 11 281 asymptomatic newborns, and 3 cases of CCVM were detected (total anomalous pulmonary venous return x2, truncus arteriosus). During the study interval, there were 9 live births of infants with CCVM from a group of 15 fetuses with CCVM detected by fetal echocardiography. Six infants with CCVM were symptomatic before screening. There was 1 false-positive screen. Two infants with negative screens were readmitted (coarctation, hypoplastic left pulmonary artery with aorto-pulmonary collaterals). Other cardiac diagnoses in the database search were nonurgent, including cases of patent foramen ovale, peripheral pulmonic stenosis, and ventricular septal defect. The prevalence of critical CCVM among all live births was 1 in 564 and among the screened population was 1 in 2256 (sensitivity: 60%; specificity: 99.95%; positive predictive value: 75%; negative predictive value: 99.98%; accuracy: 99.97%).This screening test is simple, noninvasive, and inexpensive and can be administered in conjunction with state-mandated screening. The false-negative screen patients had lesions not amenable to detection by oximetry. The sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value in this population are satisfactory, indicating that screening should be applied to larger populations, particularly where lower rates of fetal detection result in increased CCVM prevalence in asymptomatic newborns.Implementing Universal Pulse Oximetry Screening in West Virginia: Findings from Year One.In March 2012 the West Virginia legislature passed a law that mandates birth hospitals to perform pulse oximetry screening for all well-babies in the newborn nursery to improve the detection of critical congenital heart disease (CCHD). CCHD screening data collection began on September 1, 2012 at all 28 birthing hospitals. The purpose of this study was to review the first year of pulse oximetry screening outcomes and identify barriers to implementation and solutions to improve tracking and policy.All WV birth hospitals were provided with the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services recommendations for CCHD screening, and the Center for Disease Control's recommended screening algorithm for review and reference. 20,115 infants were entered into the Birth Score database between September 1, 2012 and August 31, 2013. 19,283 (91%) infants were screened for CCHD.17,101 (88.5%) infants passed, 19 infants failed, and 2,163 (11.2%) infants had missing data for the screening. 832 infants were not screened due to being admitted to the neonatal intensive care unit for reasons unknown. 17 of the 19 infants who failed the screening had a transthoracic echo report available for review. Of those 17 infants reviewed, seven were diagnosed with CCHD.85% of the infants born in WV who received a Birth Score during the year reviewed were screened for CCHD. Given that the goal is to have 100% compliance with the pulse oximetry screening, additional investigations into factors affecting compliance may be necessary.Newborn pulse oximetry screening to detect critical congenital heart disease.To describe current practice and clarify provider opinion in the US with regard to newborn pulse oximetry screening (NPOx) for critical congenital heart disease.An internet-based questionnaire was forwarded to general pediatricians, neonatologists, and family medicine physicians. Physicians were surveyed regarding involvement in newborn medicine, knowledge of NPOx recommendations, and opinions regarding screening. NPOx protocol specifics were also queried.Survey responses (n = 481) were received with 349 respondents involved in newborn medicine. Forty-nine percent (95% CI 44%-54%) of those involved in newborn medicine practice at a hospital with a NPOx protocol. Sixty-six percent of providers endorsed it as an effective tool, 20% required more education, 11% questioned its sensitivity, and 3% had no opinion. Sixty-five percent of providers were aware of recent state legislation mandating its use and 46% reported awareness of the addition of NPOx to the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel. Eighty-four percent of providers who practice at a hospital without a NPOx protocol were interested in its implementation. NPOx protocols varied and were not uniform with differences in time of test, location of probe, and values considered positive.NPOx has grown in its prevalence and acceptance in clinical practice, yet is far from universal in its application and design despite the recent American Academy of Pediatrics endorsement and its addition to the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel. The majority of physicians involved in newborn medicine deemed it an effective tool.Pulse oximetry as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease in term newborns.Pulse oximetry has been suggested as a screening test for congenital heart disease (CHD) in asymptomatic newborns. However, most newborns in Mexico are discharged from the hospital without this evaluation.To evaluate pulse oximetry as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) in term newborns.We conducted a cross-sectional study in term newborns between July 2010 and April 2011. Pulse oximetry was determined before hospital discharge; in case of post-ductal oxygen saturation < 95%, a Doppler echocardiogram was performed.From 1,037 newborns screened, two had CCHD, one had pulmonary atresia and ventricular septal defect, and one Ebstein´s anomaly. Minor CHD was present in 10 babies. The overall prevalence of CHD was 11.5 per 1000 live births, and the prevalence of CCHD was 3.9 per 1000 live births. For those with critical disease, pulse oximetry had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity 98.8%, positive predictive value 14.2%, negative predictive value 100%, and positive likelihood ratio of 86.2. In regression analysis, oxygen saturation, respiratory frequency, and postnatal age were related with CCHD.Pulse oximetry had a good sensitivity and specificity for the identification of critical congenital heart disease in term newborns. Low oxygen saturation, higher respiratory frequency, and early postnatal age were related with congenital heart disease.The contribution of pulse oximetry to the early detection of congenital heart disease in newborns.Approximately half of all newborns with congenital heart disease are asymptomatic in the first few days of life. Early detection of ductal-dependant cardiac malformations prior to ductal closure is, however, of significant clinical importance, as the treatment outcome is related to the time of diagnosis. Pulse oximetry has been proposed for early detection of congenital heart disease. The aims of the present study were: 1) to determine the effectiveness of a pulse-oximetric screening performed on the first day of life for the detection of congenital heart disease in otherwise healthy newborns and 2) to determine if a pulse-oximetric screening combined with clinical examination is superior in the diagnosis of congenital heart disease to clinical examination alone. This is a prospective, multi-centre study. Postductal pulse oximetry was performed between six and twelve hours of age in all newborns of greater than 35 weeks gestation. If pulse-oximetry-measured arterial oxygen saturation was less than 95%, echocardiography was performed. Pulse oximetry was performed in 3,262 newborns. Twenty-four infants (0.7%) had repeated saturations of less than 95%. Of these infants, 17 had congenital heart disease and five of the remaining seven had persistent pulmonary hypertension. No infant with a ductal-dependant or cyanotic congenital heart disease exhibited saturation values greater or equal to 95%.postductal pulse-oximetric screening in the first few days of life is an effective means for detecting cyanotic congenital heart disease in otherwise healthy newborns.Clinical examination and pulse oximetry as screening for congenital heart disease in low-risk newborn.To assess sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the cardiovascular physical examination (CPE) and of pulse oximetry in screening for congenital heart diseases (CHD) in asymptomatic newborn when prenatal ultrasound evaluation is negative for structural cardiac abnormalities.In this observational cohort study, 5750 asymptomatic newborns, admitted to nursery in a period of 2 years, underwent to CPE and determination of arterial oxygen saturation by pulse oxymetry between 48th and 72nd h of life.Two hundred and ninty-eight newborns presented a suspected CPE; in 70% of cases, we found a transitional alteration and in only 17% of cases, the echocardiography examination performed for suspected CPE were completely negative. Three newborns were positive to pulse oximetry screening test but negative at CPE. After discharge, one case of critical CHD was diagnosed.An accurate CPE performed by trained and experienced pediatricians is indicative of important cardiac structural alteration in more than 25%. The association of CPE and pulse oximetry allows to further improve the diagnostic accuracy.Accuracy of pulse oximetry screening for detecting critical congenital heart disease in the newborns in rural hospital of Central India.Congenital cardiovascular malformations are the most common category of birth defects and responsible for mortality in the first twelve months of life. Critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) will be present in approximately one quarter of these children, which requires catheter or surgery intervention in the first year of life.To determine the accuracy of pulse oximetry for detecting clinically unrecognized CCHD in the newborns.Pulse oximetry was performed on clinically normal newborns within first 4 hours of life. If screening oxygen saturation (SpO2) was below 90%, echocardiography was then performed.All newborns who were admitted in postnatal ward & NICU.Out born babies and babies with a prenatal diagnosis of duct dependent circulation.Pulse-oximetric screening was performed on 2110 clinically normal newborns. Low SpO2 (<90%) was found in eight babies seven of them had CCHD, including three neonates with TGA, two with tricuspid atresia, one with tetralogy of fallot and one with transposition of great vessels. A pulse oximetry cut-off value of below 90% for detecting CCHD showed 100% sensitivity, 99.95% specificity, 87.50% positive predictive value, 100% negative predictive value.Pulse oximetry is safe, feasible and noninvasive, can be used as screening tool for detecting CCHD in clinically normal newborn. If SpO2 is below 90% in clinically normal newborns within 4 hours of birth, urgent echocardiography is suggested to rule out CCHD.Combining pulse oximetry and clinical examination in screening for congenital heart disease.The objective of this study was to evaluate combined pulse oximetry and clinical examination as a screening method for congenital heart disease (CHD) in asymptomatic newborns. Asymptomatic newborns were screened for CHD using pulse oximetry and clinical examination before their discharge from the nursery. Oxygen saturation > or =94% was considered normal. Echocardiography was done for newborns with abnormal readings and for those with significant murmurs. Data concerning undetected cases were collected from the pediatric referral hospital. A total of 5211 cases were screened. Echocardiographic evaluations were done based on low pulse oximetry in five cases and on murmur detection in ten others. The sensitivity of the combined method of screening was 77%, whereas it was 31% for oximetry alone and 46% for clinical examination alone. Specificity was approximately 100% for all methods. The positive predictive value of the combined tool was 66.7%. We conclude that combining pulse oximetry and clinical examination can enhance the clinician's ability to detect life-threatening CHD in a timely manner. This screening method should become a part of the discharge plan for every newborn.Smooth implementation of critical congenital heart defect screening in a newborn nursery.In January of 2012, University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences began implementation of a critical congenital heart disease screening program to identify newborns with structural heart defects. The screening used motion tolerant pulse oximeters in direct sequence to measure the oxygen levels in the right hand and either foot of eligible newborns. Exclusion criteria included echocardiogram prior to discharge, age greater than 7 days with continuous neonatal intensive care unit monitoring, or death or transfer prior to discharge. Of the 1905 infants screened, 3 infants failed screening. Two of the infants had atrial septal defects, and 1 had a patent foramen ovale, which was considered a false positive. After planning and education, the implementation of critical congenital heart disease pulse oximetry screening was successful. With only 1 false positive in our high-risk population, this should encourage other institutions to begin screening eligible infants. Pulse oximetry screening for clinically unrecognized critical congenital heart disease in the newborns.To determine the incidence of clinically unrecognized critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) in the newborns by using pulse oximetric screening.Pulse oximetry was performed on clinically normal newborns at 24-48 hours of age. If screening oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) was below 95%, echocardiography was then performed. Data regarding true and false positives as well as negatives were collected and analyzed.Pulse-oximetric screening was performed on 1847 clinically normal newborns. Low SpO2 (<95%) was found in three babies two of them had CCHD, including one with transposition of the great vessels, one with complete atrioventricular canal with moderate tricuspid regurgitation (sensitivity: 100%; specificity: 99.8%; positive predictive value: 100%; negative predictive value: 100%; accuracy: 99.8%).In addition to routine physical examination in the newborn infants pulse oximetry may improve the early diagnosis CCHD in the newborn. If oxygen saturation in clinically normal newborns is below 95% at 24-48 hours of age, referral to a cardiology unit is suggested.Neonatal screening for critical cardiovascular anomalies using pulse oximetry.Babies with cardiac anomalies are often asymptomatic at birth, and many remain undetected despite routine newborn examination. We retrospectively assessed the effect of routine pulse oximetry in detection of such anomalies from a hospital birth population of 31 946 babies born between 1 April 1999 and 31 March 2009.29 925 babies who were not admitted to the neonatal unit at birth underwent postductal oxygen saturation measurement before discharge. If saturation was below 95% an examination was performed. If this was abnormal or saturation remained low, an echocardiogram was performed. All babies with cardiac anomaly diagnosed before 1-year were identified from the region's fetal abnormality database.Critical anomalies affected 27 infants (1 in 1180); 10 identified prenatally, 2 after echocardiogram was performed because of other anomalies, 2 in preterm infants, 2 when symptomatic before screening, 5 by oximetry screening, 1 when symptomatic in hospital after a normal screen and 5 after discharge home. Serious anomalies affected 50 infants (1 in 640); 8 identified antenatally, 7 because of other anomalies, 3 in the neonatal unit, 5 by pulse oximetry screening, 11 by routine newborn examination, and 16 after discharge home.Routine pulse oximetry aided detection of 5/27 of critical and 5/50 of serious anomalies in this sample, but did not prevent five babies with critical and 15 with serious anomalies being discharged undiagnosed. Results from screening over 250 000 babies have now been published, but this total includes only 49 babies with transposition, and even smaller numbers of rarer anomalies.Pulse oximetry with clinical assessment to screen for congenital heart disease in neonates in China: a prospective study.Several pioneering studies have provided evidence for the introduction of universal pulse oximetry screening for critical congenital heart disease. However, whether the benefits of screening reported in studies from high-income countries would translate with similar success to low-income countries is unknown. We assessed the feasibility and reliability of pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment for detection of major congenital heart disease, especially critical congenital heart disease, in China.We did a pilot study at three hospitals in Shanghai to assess the accuracy of pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment for detection of congenital heart disease. We made a data collection plan before recruitment. We then undertook a large, prospective, and multicentre screening study in which we screened all consecutive newborn babies (aged 6-72 h) born at 18 hospitals in China between Aug 1, 2011, and Nov 30, 2012. Newborn babies with positive screen results (either an abnormal pulse oximetry or abnormal clinical assessment) were referred for echocardiography within 24 h of screening. We identified false-negative results by clinical follow-up and parents' feedback. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and positive and negative likelihood ratios for pulse oximetry alone, and in combination with clinical assessment, for detection of major and critical congenital heart disease.In the pilot study, 6785 consecutive newborn babies were screened; 46 of 49 (94%) cases of asymptomatic major congenital heart disease and eight of eight (100%) cases of asymptomatic critical disease were detected by pulse oximetry and clinical assessment. In the prospective multicentre study, we screened 122,738 consecutive newborn babies (120,707 asymptomatic and 2031 symptomatic), and detected congenital heart disease in 1071 (157 critical and 330 major). In asymptomatic newborn babies, the sensitivity of pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment was 93·2% (95% CI 87·9-96·2) for critical congenital heart disease and 90·2% (86·4-93·0) for major disease. The addition of pulse oximetry to clinical assessment improved sensitivity for detection of critical congenital heart disease from 77·4% (95% CI 70·0-83·4) to 93·2% (87·9-96·2). The false-positive rate for detection of critical disease was 2·7% (3298 of 120,392) for clinical assessment alone and 0·3% (394 of 120,561) for pulse oximetry alone.Pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment is feasible and reliable for the detection of major congenital heart disease in newborn babies in China. This simple and accurate combined method should be used in maternity hospitals to screen for congenital heart disease.Key Clinical Research Project sponsored by Ministry of Health, Shanghai Public Health Three-Year Action Plan sponsored by Shanghai Municipal Government, and National Basic Research Project of China.Modern Strategy for Identification of Congenital Heart Defects in the Neonatal Period.Congenital heart defects are the most common congenital anomalies and occur with an incidence from 0.8 to 1% per 1000 live births. In recent years, the pulse oximetry has become a strong candidate for detecting cyanogen congenital heart defects and in combination with routine clinical exam can improve diagnostic of congenital heart diseases.To apply the modern algorithm for early detection of congenital heart defects in order to improve the diagnosis in the neonatal period.This was a prospective study that included children born in Bihac Cantonal Hospital during 2012. The diagnostic algorithm included a clinical examination of the newborn, measuring of transcutaneous oxygen saturation with the pulse oximeter between 24 and 48 hours of life, and, in some cases, additional tests (cardiac ultrasound).A total of 1,865 children were examined. The application of diagnostic protocol identified the existence of congenital heart defects in 29 children. In re-evaluating the auscultator and ultrasound findings, we identified congenital heart defects in 19 children.The application of the modern algorithm for early detection of congenital heart diseases in the neonatal period can significantly improve the making of diagnosis of these anomalies. The concept is simple, inexpensive and applicable in most maternity wards.Effectiveness of neonatal pulse oximetry screening for detection of critical congenital heart disease in daily clinical routine--results from a prospective multicenter study.Pulse oximetry screening (POS) has been proposed as an effective, noninvasive, inexpensive tool allowing earlier diagnosis of critical congenital heart disease (cCHD). Our aim was to test the hypothesis that POS can reduce the diagnostic gap in cCHD in daily clinical routine in the setting of tertiary, secondary and primary care centres. We conducted a prospective multicenter trial in Saxony, Germany. POS was performed in healthy term and post-term newborns at the age of 24-72 h. If an oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) of <or=95% was measured on lower extremities and confirmed after 1 h, complete clinical examination and echocardiography were performed. POS was defined as false-negative when a diagnosis of cCHD was made after POS in the participating hospitals/at our centre. From July 2006-June 2008, 42,240 newborns from 34 institutions have been included. Seventy-two children were excluded due to prenatal diagnosis (n = 54) or clinical signs of cCHD (n = 18) before POS. Seven hundred ninety-five newborns did not receive POS, mainly due to early discharge after birth (n = 727; 91%). In 41,445 newborns, POS was performed. POS was true positive in 14, false positive in 40, true negative in 41,384 and false negative in four children (three had been excluded for violation of study protocol). Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value were 77.78%, 99.90%, 25.93% and 99.99%, respectively. With POS as an adjunct to prenatal diagnosis, physical examination and clinical observation, the percentage of newborns with late diagnosis of cCHD was 4.4%. POS can substantially reduce the postnatal diagnostic gap in cCHD, and false-positive results leading to unnecessary examinations of healthy newborns are rare. POS should be implemented in routine postnatal care.Reliability of a single pulse oximetry reading as a screening test for congenital heart disease in otherwise asymptomatic newborn infants: the importance of human factors.The use of routine pulse oximetry to detect neonates with undiagnosed congenital heart disease before nursery discharge has been studied. The reported sensitivities with asymptomatic patients have been less than expected and vary widely, bringing into question the reliability of the test. This study aimed to assess whether routine pulse oximetry contributes to identifying patients with critical congenital heart disease, and to determine the reliability of a single pulse oximeter reading for screening asymptomatic newborn infants.Between December 26, 2003 and December 31, 2005, three hospitals in west central Florida performed pulse oximetry routinely on all newborns at the time of discharge. Patients who received a diagnosis of critical congenital heart disease during the study period were identified to assess whether the pulse oximetry reading initiated their diagnosis. In one hospital, the pulse oximeter data were evaluated for reliability. Downloaded data were compared to a log compiled by the nursery personnel, first without (Phase 1) and then with (Phase 2) their knowledge and additional training. The results were characterized as reliable, probe placed but reading not verifiable, or no evidence of probe placement.Among the 7,962 infants who received oximetry testing, there were 12 postnatal diagnoses of critical congenital heart disease. None was initially identified by routine pulse oximetry. Pulse oximetry reliability improved substantially between Phases 1 and 2 (38% vs 60%; p < 0.0001). Optimal reliability (>95%) was obtained by a nurse with a licensed practical nurse degree or higher performing an assessment of at least 360 s.Routine pulse oximetry was neither reliable nor an important diagnostic tool for our cohort. Important human factors (probe placement time, oximetry training, and nursing degree) have an impact on single-determination pulse oximetry reliability. With routine surveillance and quality improvement, the reliability of this test can be increased. Future studies to determine the effectiveness of pulse oximetry screening for the diagnosis of congenital heart disease in the asymptomatic newborn population must address these factors. Until such a study demonstrates acceptable sensitivity and clinical value, universal screening should not be instituted.Pulse Oximetry Screening for Critical Congenital Heart Disease after Home Birth and Early Discharge.To assess the feasibility of pulse oximetry (PO) screening in settings with home births and very early discharge. We assessed this with an adapted protocol in The Netherlands.PO screening was performed in the Leiden region in hospitals and by community midwives. Measurements were taken ≥ 1 hour after birth and on day 2 or 3 during the midwife visit. Primary outcome was the percentage of screened infants with parental consent. The time point of screening, oxygen saturation, false positive (FP) screenings, critical congenital heart defects (CCHDs), and other detected pathology were registered.In a 1-year period, 3625 eligible infants were born. Parents of 491 infants were not approached for consent, and 44 refused the screening. PO screening was performed in 3059/3090 (99%) infants with obtained consent. Median (IQR) time points of the first and second screening were 1.8 (1.3-2.8) and 37 (27-47) hours after birth. In 394 infants with screening within 1 hour after birth, the median pre- and postductal oxygen saturations were 99% (98%-100%) and 99% (97%-100%). No CCHD was detected. The FP prevalence was 1.0% overall (0.6% in the first hours after birth). After referral, important noncritical cardiac and other noncardiac pathology was found in 62% of the FP screenings.PO screening for CCHD is feasible after home births and very early discharge from hospital. Important neonatal pathology was detected at an early stage, potentially increasing the safety of home births and early discharge policy.Pulse oximetry screening at 4 hours of age to detect critical congenital heart defects.The purpose of this prospective study was to assess the feasibility and reliability of pulse oximetry screening to detect critical congenital heart defects in a newborn nursery.The study was performed in a large urban hospital with an exclusively inborn population. Stable neonates who had a gestational age of >or=35 weeks and birth weight of >or=2100 g and in whom a critical congenital heart defect was not suspected were admitted to the newborn nursery. When the 4-hour pulse oximetry reading was <96%, pulse oximetry was repeated at discharge, and when the pulse oximetry reading remained at persistently <96%, echocardiography was performed.Of 15299 admissions to newborn nursery during the 12-month study period, 15233 (99.6%) neonates were screened with 4-hour pulse oximetry. Pulse oximetry readings were >or=96% for 14374 (94.4%) neonates; 77 were subsequently evaluated before discharge for cardiac defects on the basis of clinical examination. Seventy-six were normal, and 1 had tetralogy of Fallot with discontinuous pulmonary arteries. Pulse oximetry readings at 4 hours were <96% in 859 (5.6%); 768 were rescreened at discharge, and 767 neonates had a pulse oximetry reading at >or=96%. One neonate had persistently low pulse oximetry at discharge; echocardiography was normal. Although 3 neonates with a critical congenital heart defect had a 4-hour pulse oximetry reading of <96%, all developed signs and/or symptoms of a cardiac defect and received a diagnosis on the basis of clinical findings, not screening results.All neonates with a critical congenital heart defect were detected clinically, and no cases of critical congenital heart defect were detected by pulse oximetry screening. These results indicate that pulse oximetry screening does not improve detection of critical congenital heart defects above and beyond clinical observation and assessment. Our findings do not support a recommendation for routine pulse oximetry screening in seemingly healthy neonates.First day of life pulse oximetry screening to detect congenital heart defects.To evaluate the efficacy of first day of life pulse oximetry screening to detect congenital heart defects (CHDs).We performed a population-based prospective multicenter study of postductal (foot) arterial oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) in apparently healthy newborns after transfer from the delivery suite to the nursery. SpO(2) < 95% led to further diagnostic evaluations. Of 57,959 live births, 50,008 (86%) were screened. In the screened population, 35 CHDs were [corrected] classified as critical (ductus dependent, cyanotic). CHDs were prospectively registered and diagnosed in 658/57,959 (1.1%) [corrected]Of the infants screened, 324 (0.6%) failed the test. Of these, 43 (13%) had CHDs (27 critical), and 134 (41%) had pulmonary diseases or other disorders. The remaining 147 infants (45%) were healthy with transitional circulation. The median age for babies with CHDs at failing the test was 6 hours (range, 1-21 hours). For identifying critical CHDs, the pulse oximetry screening had a sensitivity rate of 77.1% (95% CI, 59.4-89.0), specificity rate of 99.4% (95% CI, 99.3-99.5), and a false-positive rate of 0.6% (95% CI, 0.5-0.7).Early pulse oximetry screening promotes early detection of critical CHDs and other potentially severe diseases. The sensitivity rate for detecting critical CHDs is high, and the false-positive rate is low.Early screening for critical congenital heart defects in asymptomatic newborns in Bursa province.In this study, pulse oximetry screening results in the early diagnosis of critical congenital heart diseases (CCHD) will be evaluated.Eight-thousand two-hundred and eight of 10,200 newborns born between January 2014 and December 2014 were screened using pulse oximetry for the diagnosis of CCHD. Screening test was considered to be positive in the newborns whose saturation after 24 h from the birth with pulse oximetry was ≤ 95% and/or in the newborns who had a difference of ≥ 3% between the lower and right upper extremity.Incidence of CCHD was 1 per 1000 live births. Coarctation of the aorta was the most commonly determined CCHD. Sensitivity, specificity, false negative rate and false positive rate of pulse oximetry in the diagnosis of CCHD were 60%, 99.8%, 40% and 0.12%, respectively. Seventy-five percent of the newborns who had a false negative diagnosis with pulse oximetry had coarctation of the aorta. Coarctation of the aorta was determined at a rate of 20% using CCHD screening.The diagnosis of coarctation of the aorta is missed in the newborns screened with pulse oximetry in the first 24-48 h after birth. Screening with pulse oximetry should be repeated for early diagnosis of coarctation of the aorta.Routine pulse oximetry in the asymptomatic newborn.To assess the effect of routine measurement of postductal oxygen saturation as an adjunct to routine clinical examination in the asymptomatic newborn.Prospective study in a district general hospital.All 6166 infants inborn between 1 April 1999 and 31 March 2001.Oxygen saturation was measured over two minutes, after the age of 2 hours and before discharge, in one foot of all babies not admitted directly to the neonatal unit. Babies with fractional (as opposed to functional) oxygen saturation (SaO(2)) below 95% were examined by the midwife. If this examination was abnormal or if normal but further measurements were below 95%, an echocardiogram was performed. All babies with cardiac malformations diagnosed by 1 year of age were identified from databases maintained at the regional cardiology referral unit and the regional congenital malformation survey.Measurements were made in 98% of eligible babies. A fractional SaO(2) less than 95% was found in 5% but persisted in only 1%. Structural cardiac malformations were found in 50 (8.1/1000), 26 of whom had isolated ventricular septal defects. Of the remaining 24 with other cardiac malformations, attention was first drawn to six by low SaO(2), and four more, first noticed for other reasons, also had low SaO(2). Low SaO(2) also first drew attention to 13 other babies ill for other reasons.Newborn babies with important cardiac malformations are often asymptomatic initially and the yield from clinical examination is poor. Measuring postductal saturation routinely in newborn babies before discharge is easy and can alert staff to ill babies.Pulse oximetry screening as a complementary strategy to detect critical congenital heart defects.To compare strategies with and without first-day of life pulse oximetry screening to detect critical congenital heart defects (CCHDs).Population based study including all live born infants in Norway in 2005 and 2006 (n = 116 057). Postductal (foot) arterial oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) was measured in apparently healthy newborns after transferral to the nursery, with SpO(2) < 95% as cut-off point. Out of 57 959 live births in the hospitals performing pulse oximetry screening, 50 008 (86%) were screened.A total of 136 CCHDs (1.2 per 1000) were diagnosed, 38 (28%) of these prenatally. Of the CCHDs detected after birth, 44/50 (88%) were detected before discharge in the population offered pulse oximetry screening (25 by pulse oximetry), compared to 37/48 (77%) in the non-screened population (p = 0.15). Median times for diagnosing CCHDs in-hospital before discharge were 6 and 16 h after birth respectively (p < 0.0001). In the screened population 6/50 (12%) CCHDs were missed and recognized after discharge because of symptoms. Two of the six missed cases failed the pulse oximetry screening, but were overlooked (echocardiography not performed before discharge). If these cases had been recognized, 4/50 (8%) would have been missed compared to 11/48 (23%) in the non-screened population (p = 0.05). Of the cases missed, 14/17 (82%) had left-sided obstructive lesions.First-day of life pulse oximetry screening provides early in-hospital detection of CCHDs and may reduce the number missed and diagnosed after discharge.Pulse oximetry as a screening test for congenital heart defects in newborn infants: a test accuracy study with evaluation of acceptability and cost-effectiveness.Screening for congenital heart defects (CHDs) relies on antenatal ultrasound and postnatal clinical examination; however, life-threatening defects often go undetected.To determine the accuracy, acceptability and cost-effectiveness of pulse oximetry as a screening test for CHDs in newborn infants.A test accuracy study determined the accuracy of pulse oximetry. Acceptability of testing to parents was evaluated through a questionnaire, and to staff through focus groups. A decision-analytic model was constructed to assess cost-effectiveness.Six UK maternity units.These were 20,055 asymptomatic newborns at ≥ 35 weeks' gestation, their mothers and health-care staff.Pulse oximetry was performed prior to discharge from hospital and the results of this index test were compared with a composite reference standard (echocardiography, clinical follow-up and follow-up through interrogation of clinical databases).Detection of major CHDs - defined as causing death or requiring invasive intervention up to 12 months of age (subdivided into critical CHDs causing death or intervention before 28 days, and serious CHDs causing death or intervention between 1 and 12 months of age); acceptability of testing to parents and staff; and the cost-effectiveness in terms of cost per timely diagnosis.Fifty-three of the 20,055 babies screened had a major CHD (24 critical and 29 serious), a prevalence of 2.6 per 1000 live births. Pulse oximetry had a sensitivity of 75.0% [95% confidence interval (CI) 53.3% to 90.2%] for critical cases and 49.1% (95% CI 35.1% to 63.2%) for all major CHDs. When 23 cases were excluded, in which a CHD was already suspected following antenatal ultrasound, pulse oximetry had a sensitivity of 58.3% (95% CI 27.7% to 84.8%) for critical cases (12 babies) and 28.6% (95% CI 14.6% to 46.3%) for all major CHDs (35 babies). False-positive (FP) results occurred in 1 in 119 babies (0.84%) without major CHDs (specificity 99.2%, 95% CI 99.0% to 99.3%). However, of the 169 FPs, there were six cases of significant but not major CHDs and 40 cases of respiratory or infective illness requiring medical intervention. The prevalence of major CHDs in babies with normal pulse oximetry was 1.4 (95% CI 0.9 to 2.0) per 1000 live births, as 27 babies with major CHDs (6 critical and 21 serious) were missed. Parent and staff participants were predominantly satisfied with screening, perceiving it as an important test to detect ill babies. There was no evidence that mothers given FP results were more anxious after participating than those given true-negative results, although they were less satisfied with the test. White British/Irish mothers were more likely to participate in the study, and were less anxious and more satisfied than those of other ethnicities. The incremental cost-effectiveness ratio of pulse oximetry plus clinical examination compared with examination alone is approximately £24,900 per timely diagnosis in a population in which antenatal screening for CHDs already exists.Pulse oximetry is a simple, safe, feasible test that is acceptable to parents and staff and adds value to existing screening. It is likely to identify cases of critical CHDs that would otherwise go undetected. It is also likely to be cost-effective given current acceptable thresholds. The detection of other pathologies, such as significant CHDs and respiratory and infective illnesses, is an additional advantage. Other pulse oximetry techniques, such as perfusion index, may enhance detection of aortic obstructive lesions.The National Institute for Health Research Health Technology programme.Pulse oximetry as a screening tool for detecting major congenital heart defects in Indian newborns.To evaluate the use of pulse oximetry as a screening tool for detecting major congenital heart defects (CHDs) in Indian newborns.Cross-sectional observational study.In a community hospital of north India, babies born during a specific 8 h period of the day were recruited over a period of 3 years. Newborns with incomplete documentation were excluded.Routine clinical examination, pulse oximetry and bedside echocardiography.Any abnormalities in clinical examination and pulse oximetry were recorded. CHDs were diagnosed using bedside echocardiography. Accuracy of pulse oximetry, clinical examination and their combination for detecting major CHDs was calculated.Among the 19 009 newborns screened, 70 had major CHDs at birth (44 serious, 26 critical). Pulse oximetry detected 39 major (sensitivity 55.7%, 95% CI 44.1% to 66.8%; specificity 68.3%, 67.6% to 68.9%) and 22 critical CHDs (sensitivity 84.6%, 66.5% to 93.9%; specificity 68.3%, 67.6% to 68.9%). Addition of pulse oximetry to clinical examination significantly improved sensitivity for major CHDs (35.7% (25.5% to 47.4%) to 75.7% (64.5% to 85.3%), p<0.01) and critical CHDs (11.5% (4.0% to 29.0%) to 84.6% (66.5% to 93.9%), p<0.01).Pulse oximetry is a sensitive screening tool for detecting major CHDs in Indian newborns. It adds significant value to the current practice of using clinical examination as a sole screening tool for detecting major CHDs. However, specificity of pulse oximetry was much lower in our study. Possible reasons for low specificity could be non-repetition of pulse oximetry in newborns with initial lower saturations, high prevalence of infections and respiratory issues in our cohort and use of non-motion tolerant oximeter.Effectiveness of pulse-oximetry in addition to routine neonatal examination in detection of congenital heart disease in asymptomatic newborns.To assess the feasibility and effectiveness of pulse-oximetry as a screening tool in the detection of critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) in newborns.Post-natal babies born between 01/01/2007-31/12/2009 were eligible. Post-ductal pulse-oximetry was performed using Nellcor® NPB 40 pulse oximeter with reusable OXI-A/N saturation probe. Saturations ≥95% were deemed normal. If saturations were <95%, an echocardiogram was done. The regional paediatric cardiology database and death records identified babies later diagnosed with CCHD.6329/9613 eligible babies were studied and pulse-oximetry was performed at a mean age of 28 hours (range 6-72 hours). Fourteen babies had saturations <95%. CCHD was diagnosed in 7/14 babies; 4/7 had no clinical signs. Of the remaining 7 babies, 3 had non-critical but significant CHD and 4 had an undiagnosed respiratory illness or sepsis. All babies with low saturations had identifiable pathologies. One baby with normal saturations was later diagnosed with transposition of the great arteries. The sensitivity and specificity of identifying an unwell baby was 93.3% and 100% respectively; the sensitivity and specificity of identifying CCHD was 87.5% and 99.8% respectively. Clinical examination alone would have missed 4/7 (57%) of these.Pulse-oximetry is safe, acceptable, non-invasive and effective. Our study supports the routine use of pulse oximetry as part of the newborn check.Development of a Newborn Screening Program for Critical Congenital Heart Disease (CCHD) in Taipei.Early detection of critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) can significantly reduce morbidity and mortality among newborns. We investigate the feasibility of implementing a community-based newborn CCHD screening program in Taipei.Twelve birthing facilities in Taipei participated in a trial screening program between October 1, 2013, and March 31, 2014. Newborns underwent pulse oximetry at 24-36 h old, with probes attached to the right hand and one lower limb. Any screening saturation ≥95% in either extremity, with an absolute difference of ≤3% between the right hand and foot, was accepted as a screening pass. A screening result was considered as a fail if the oxygen saturation was <95% at either probe site, on 3 separate occasions, each separated by 30 min or the first result was <95% at either probe site, and any subsequent oxygen saturation measurement was <90%. Public health nurses would follow up all missed or refused cases.Of the 6,387 live births, 6,296 newborns (coverage rate: 6,296/6,387 = 98.6%) underwent appropriate pulse oximetry screening. Sixteen newborns (0.25%) were reported to have a failed screening result. Five of these screen positive newborns were confirmed with CCHD; two of them were diagnosed solely attributed to the failed screening results. The false-positive rate was 0.18%. Implementing a 6-month screening program for CCHD produced good case detection rate, while using efficient screening and referral systems.This program was successful in integrating screening, referral and public health tracking systems. The protocol outlined in this report could provide a community-based model for worldwide implementation.Implementation of critical congenital heart disease screening in Minnesota.To assess the level of preparedness and resources needed in Minnesota for the implementation of newborn screening for critical congenital heart diseases (CCHDs).A cross sectional survey of all birth centers in Minnesota was performed to assess the capacity to deliver care essential for the CCHD screening program. Compliance with the screening algorithm, nursing workload, and cost were assessed by using a pilot program implemented in 6 normal newborn nurseries.Ninety-one of 99 eligible centers participated in the survey and 90 reported the ability to screen newborns in accordance with recommendations. Only 22 centers, with 63% of births, had access to echocardiography and routinely stocked prostaglandins for neonatal use. Our pilot study screened 7549 newborns with 6 failed screens and 1 CCHD diagnosis. Two of the failed screens were due to misinterpretation of the algorithm, 1 failed screen was not reported, and 4 failed screens were not recognized. Repeated screens were required for 115 newborns, with 29% of retesting due to misinterpretation of the algorithm. The mean nursing time required was 5.5 minutes, and the cost was $5.10 per screen.In Minnesota, two-thirds of newborns are born in centers with resources for initial diagnosis and management of CCHD. Implementation of a pilot screening program demonstrated minimal increase in nursing workload, but identified problems with interpretation of the algorithm and data reporting. This pilot project suggests the need for simplification of the algorithm, additional training of health care providers, and development of a centralized reporting mechanism.Evaluation of a Screening Program to Detect Critical Congenital Heart Defects in Newborns.To report the results of and to identify problems with implementing a screening program to detect critical congenital heart defects (CCHDs) in newborns by using differential pulse oximetry (POx).Charts of all live-born infants from 4 Yale-New Haven health system hospitals in Connecticut between January 1 and December 31, 2014, were reviewed.Of 10 589 newborns, 171 (1.6%) underwent an echocardiogram before screening, 10 320 (97.5%) were screened by POx, and 98 (0.9%) were not screened. Thirteen newborns (0.1%) were diagnosed with a CCHD. No infants with CCHDs were identified through POx screening (POxS) alone. Eleven (85%) were already suspected of having a CCHD lesion on the basis of prenatal ultrasound, 1 (8%) was diagnosed because of clinical concern before undergoing screening, and 1 (8%) had a false-negative screening result, but a CCHD was identified after an echocardiogram was performed because a murmur was heard. Four infants with a positive POx screen showed noncritical cardiac lesions by echocardiogram. The majority of infants were screened within the recommended 24 to 72 hours of age interval and had POx screens that were interpreted and documented correctly. Of 10 316 infants with negative POx screens, 52.1% were still in the Yale-New Haven Hospital health system at 1 year of age and no CCHD lesions were listed in their charts.Although a CCHD screening program was effectively implemented, perhaps because most children with a CCHD (85%) were detected antenatally by ultrasound, in our hospital system POxS did not lead to a substantial increase in the early identification of CCHDs.Oxygen saturation as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease: a preliminary study.The aim of this study was to assess the utility of arm and leg oxygen saturation as a candidate screening test for the early detection of ductal-dependent left heart obstructive disease. We measured arm and leg oxygen saturation in 2876 newborns admitted to well baby nurseries and 32 newborns with congenital heart disease. Fifty-seven newborns in the well baby nurseries (0.02%) had an abnormal test (leg saturation less than 92% in room air or 7% lower saturation in the leg than in the arm). Four of the 57 had critical congenital heart disease, including 1 with coarctation of the aorta. Of the 32 newborns with congenital heart disease, 11/13 (85%) with left heart obstructive disease had abnormal oxygen saturation tests, as did 15/19 (79%) with other forms of congenital heart disease. Pulse oximetry deserves further study as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease.The impact and efficacy of routine pulse oximetry screening for CHD in a local hospital.The objective of this study was to evaluate the impact and efficacy of pulse oximetry screening for CHD in a level-two neonatal unit without on-site access to paediatric echocardiography.All neonatal unit admissions between 1 September, 2011 and 31 August, 2013 were reviewed to determine the outcomes of newborns identified by pulse oximetry screening. Record linkage with the National Congenital Heart Disease Audit allowed follow-up of newborns with a negative screening result.There were 11,233 live births during the study period, with 973 neonatal unit admissions unrelated to pulse oximetry screening. From the remaining screening population of 10,260 newborns, 23 were admitted on the basis of a screen-positive result; three of the 23 patients went on to have urgent echocardiograms, and two were found to have critical CHD. In the 21 newborns without critical CHD, an alternative diagnosis was made in 16 cases. Record linkage with the National Congenital Heart Disease Audit indicated that no newborns born in the hospital during the study period received surgery for critical CHD following negative screening. The estimated sensitivity of screening was 100% (95% confidence interval 15.81-100%) and specificity was 99.80% (95% confidence interval 99.69-99.87%), with a false-positive rate of 0.20% (95% confidence interval 0.13-0.31%).The introduction of pulse oximetry screening to a hospital where paediatric echocardiography services are not available is practical, results in very few referrals to the regional paediatric cardiology centre, and detects cases of CHD that would otherwise go undiagnosed. Record linkage with a national CHD database provides a straightforward method for tracking cases of CHD that may have been missed by screening.The impact of routine predischarge pulse oximetry screening in a regional neonatal unit.(i) To evaluate the impact of routine early pulse oximetry screening on the rate of unexpected neonatal unit (NNU) admissions and the need for echocardiography. (ii) To review the outcomes of babies admitted as a result of a positive pulse oximetry screening test.Retrospective review over a 40-month period.Level 3 NNU.All babies admitted as a result of positive pulse oximetry screening.Indication for admission, clinical diagnosis and management were collated. Results 3552 babies were admitted during the study period. Of these, 1651 were unexpected admissions and 208/1651 (12.6%) were as a result of positive pulse oximetry screening. 165/208 babies (79%) had a significant clinical condition which required further intervention including 17 with congenital heart defect (CHD) (nine critical), 55 with pneumonia, 30 with sepsis and 12 with pulmonary hypertension. No baby died or collapsed on the postnatal ward during the study period. 61/208 babies (29%) had echocardiography and CHD was detected in 28%. Conclusions Routine use of pulse oximetry screening identifies babies with CHD and other illnesses, which, if not identified early could potentially lead to postnatal collapse. It does not appear to overload clinical services, resulting in appropriate admission in the majority and a modest increase in the number of echocardiograms performed.Early screening for critical congenital heart defects in asymptomatic newborns in Mazovia province: experience of the POLKARD pulse oximetry programme 2006-2008 in Poland.Early diagnosis of critical congenital heart defects (CCHD) may be missed both during prenatal echocardiography and the short stay in the neonatal nursery, leading to circulatory collapse or death of the newborn before readmission to hospital.To assess the usefulness of pulse oximetry as a screening test in early diagnosis of CCHD in newborns.A prospective screening pulse oximetry test was conducted in 51 neonatal units in the Mazovia province of Poland as part of the POLKARD 2006-2008 programme between 16 January, 2007 and 31 January, 2008. Newborns with no circulatory symptoms or coexisting diseases, and no prenatal diagnosis, were enrolled. The test was performed between the 2(nd) and 24(th) hours of life in stable newborns. A double arterial oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) reading < 95% on a lower extremity led to cardiovascular evaluation and echocardiography.From a population of 52,993 newborns (14.2% of births in Poland), a group of 51,698 asymptomatic infants was isolated. CCHD was diagnosed solely by pulse oximetry in 15 newborns, which constituted 18.3% of all CCHD; 14 (0.026%) false positives were obtained and there were four false negative results. The sensitivity of the test was 78.9% and specificity 99.9%. The positive predictive value was 51.7% and negative 99.9%.Pulse oximetry fulfilling the screening test criteria, performed on a large population of newborns in Poland, proved useful in supporting prenatal diagnostics and postnatal physical examination in the early detection of initially asymptomatic CCHD. Good sensitivity and specificity results of the pulse oximetry test have allowed it to be recommended for use in neonatal units nationwide.Impact of pulse oximetry screening on the detection of duct dependent congenital heart disease: a Swedish prospective screening study in 39,821 newborns.To evaluate the use of pulse oximetry to screen for early detection of life threatening congenital heart disease.Prospective screening study with a new generation pulse oximeter before discharge from well baby nurseries in West Götaland. Cohort study comparing the detection rate of duct dependent circulation in West Götaland with that in other regions not using pulse oximetry screening. Deaths at home with undetected duct dependent circulation were included.All 5 maternity units in West Götaland and the supraregional referral centre for neonatal cardiac surgery.39,821 screened babies born between 1 July 2004 and 31 March 2007. Total duct dependent circulation cohorts: West Götaland n=60, other referring regions n=100.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and likelihood ratio for pulse oximetry screening and for neonatal physical examination alone.In West Götaland 29 babies in well baby nurseries had duct dependent circulation undetected before neonatal discharge examination. In 13 cases, pulse oximetry showed oxygen saturations <or=90%, and (in accordance with protocol) clinical staff were immediately told of the results. Of the remaining 16 cases, physical examination alone detected 10 (63%). Combining physical examination with pulse oximetry screening had a sensitivity of 24/29 (82.8% (95% CI 64.2% to 95.2%)) and detected 100% of the babies with duct dependent lung circulation. Five cases were missed (all with aortic arch obstruction). False positive rate with pulse oximetry was substantially lower than that with physical examination alone (69/39 821 (0.17%) v 729/38 413 (1.90%), P<0.0001), and 31/69 of the "false positive" cases with pulse oximetry had other pathology. Thus, referral of all cases with positive oximetry results for echocardiography resulted in only 2.3 echocardiograms with normal cardiac findings for every true positive case of duct dependent circulation. In the cohort study, the risk of leaving hospital with undiagnosed duct dependent circulation was 28/100 (28%) in other referring regions versus 5/60 (8%) in West Götaland (P=0.0025, relative risk 3.36 (95% CI 1.37 to 8.24)). In the other referring regions 11/25 (44%) of babies with transposition of the great arteries left hospital undiagnosed versus 0/18 in West Götaland (P=0.0010), and severe acidosis at diagnosis was more common (33/100 (33%) v 7/60 (12%), P=0.0025, relative risk 2.8 (1.3 to 6.0)). Excluding premature babies and Norwood surgery, babies discharged without diagnosis had higher mortality than those diagnosed in hospital (4/27 (18%) v 1/110 (0.9%), P=0.0054). No baby died from undiagnosed duct dependent circulation in West Götaland versus five babies from the other referring regions.Introducing pulse oximetry screening before discharge improved total detection rate of duct dependent circulation to 92%. Such screening seems cost neutral in the short term, but the probable prevention of neurological morbidity and reduced need for preoperative neonatal intensive care suggest that such screening will be cost effective long term.Indications and limitations for a neonatal pulse oximetry screening of critical congenital heart disease.Critical congenital cardiovascular malformations (CCVMs) require surgical correction during the first month of life, physical examination is unable to detect >50% of affected infants. An oximetry screening has been previously proposed. Our aim was to verify the usefulness and consistency of a pulse oximetry screening for early detection of CCVMs in a small size nursery.A single determination of SpO2 was performed on 5292 consecutive apparently healthy newborns, discharged from nursery at a median age of 72 h during the period May 1, 2000 and November 30, 2004. Infants showing signs of congenital heart disease before the screening and those with a prenatal diagnosis were excluded. Cardiac ultrasound was performed on all infants with SpO2< or =95% at >24 h. The accuracy of the screening in identifying CCVMs was assessed by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) curves analysis.We found 2 (0.038%) true positives, 1 (0.019%) false negative, 1 (0.019%) false positive, and 5288 (99.92%) true negatives. Prevalence of critical CCVMs was 1 in 1764. Clinical follow-up showed no evidence of CCVMs in the negative cases. A pulse-oximetry cut-off value of < or =95% showed 66.7% sensitivity (95% CI: 11.6-94.5), 100% specificity (95% CI: 99.9-100.0), 50% positive predictive value, 100% negative predictive value and AUC of 0.833 (standard error: 0.145) (95% CI: 0.823 to 0.843) in identifying CCVMs.Our findings indicate that pulse oximetry is a non-invasive and specific screening tool for an early detection of CCVMs, and is easily applicable to a small size nursery.Post-implementation review of pulse oximetry screening of well newborns in an Australian tertiary maternity hospital.Despite there being evidence that pulse oximetry screening is better than clinical examination alone in early detection of CHD, implementation has been slow. The aim of this paper was to evaluate the practice after its implementation into routine care at Royal Prince Alfred Hospital in 2008.A single pulse oximetry measurement was incorporated in the routine discharge newborn examination or, with early discharge, as a part of the Midwife Discharge Support Programme. An oxygen saturation level greater than or equal to 95% was considered normal, and a level less than 95%, confirmed on a repeat measure, triggered a review and examination by a consultant neonatal paediatrician. The saturation levels were recorded in the hospital database. Ascertainment of major CHD requiring surgery in the first 12 months was performed by searching the cardiac surgery database of the Heart Centre for Children.A total of 18 801 babies were screened over a 42-month period. Of these, four babies with major CHD were diagnosed prior to discharge with the main clinical alert resulting from routine pulse oximetry screening (true positive). Of the 11 cases with saturation <95% but no CHD (false positive cases), six had respiratory pathology. One baby with normal saturation level needed surgery in the first year for a large ventricular septal defect (false negative). The false positive rate of pulse oximetry screening for CHD was 0.13% with sensitivity 80%, specificity of 99.8%, a positive predictive value of 13.3% and a negative predictive value of 99.9%. Nine additional echocardiogram were required over 42 months.These post-implementation data confirm that pulse oximetry screening increases early diagnosis of major CHD as well as other important pathology with a very low false positive rate and minimal requirement for extra echocardiograms. Pulse oximetry screening of apparently well newborns should become a standard of care.The reliability of a single pulse oximetry reading as a screening test for congenital heart disease in otherwise asymptomatic newborn infants.Routine pulse oximetry has been studied to detect children with otherwise undiagnosed congenital heart disease prior to nursery discharge. The reported sensitivities in asymptomatic patients have been less than expected and vary widely, bringing into question the reliability of the test. The purpose of this study was to assess whether routine pulse oximetry contributes to identifying patients with critical congenital heart disease and to determine the reliability of a single pulse oximeter reading in screening asymptomatic newborn infants. Between December 26, 2003, and December 31, 2005, three hospitals in west central Florida performed a pulse oximetry routinely on all newborns at the time of discharge. Patients diagnosed with critical congenital heart disease during the study period were identified to assess whether the pulse oximetry reading initiated their diagnosis. In one hospital, the pulse oximeter data were evaluated for reliability. Downloaded data were compared to a log compiled by the nursery personnel, first without (phase 1) and then with (phase 2) their knowledge and additional training. Results were characterized as reliable, probe placed but reading not verifiable, or no evidence of probe placement. Of the 7962 infants who received oximetry testing, there were 12 postnatal diagnoses of critical congenital heart disease. None was initially identified by routine pulse oximetry. Pulse oximetry reliability improved substantially between phase 1 and phase 2 (38 v. 60%, p < 0.0001). Optimal reliability (>95%) was obtained by a nurse with a degree of LPN or higher performing an assessment of at least 360 seconds. Routine pulse oximetry was neither reliable nor an important diagnostic tool in our cohort. Important human factors (probe placement time, oximetry training, and nursing degree) impact single determination pulse oximetry reliability. With routine surveillance and quality improvement, the reliability of this test can be increased. Future studies to determine the effectiveness of pulse oximetry screening for the diagnosis of congenital heart disease in the asymptomatic newborn population must address these factors. Until such a study demonstrates acceptable sensitivity and clinical value, universal screening should not be instituted.The use of pulse oximetry to detect congenital heart disease.To evaluate whether pulse oximetry can be used as a screening test to detect congenital heart disease (CHD) in otherwise well newborns before nursery discharge.Births at Lakeland Regional Medical Center (LRMC) who met inclusion criteria, had a single pulse oximeter reading before discharge. A normal reading was considered to be >94%. Abnormal readings were repeated on a different extremity and if still abnormal, an echocardiography was performed. The number of children with CHD and the number of echocardiograms were compared with the previous year at LRMC.There were 2114 infants enrolled, 88 echocardiograms (3.8%) were performed, and 43 were abnormal (yield = 48.9%), of which 12 required management (13.6%). The control group consisted of 2851 births, producing 108 echocardiograms (3.8%), 42 of which were abnormal (38.9%), and 13 required management (12.0%). No comparisons were significant. During both years, 3 children with cyanotic CHD were born. Routine pulse oximetry failed to detect a child with total anomalous pulmonary venous return. Not a single normal echocardiogram was generated by the study.Routine pulse oximetry was nearly 100% specific for detecting cyanotic CHD; as a result there was no increase in the number of echocardiograms. Routine pulse oximetry did detect a child who might not have been detected otherwise but failed to detect one that should have been detected.Effectiveness of pulse oximetry screening for congenital heart disease in asymptomatic newborns.To determine the sensitivity, specificity, predictive value, and accuracy of a program of pulse oximetry screening of asymptomatic newborns for critical congenital cardiovascular malformation (CCVM).Pulse oximetry was performed on asymptomatic newborns in the well-infant nurseries of 2 hospitals. Cardiac ultrasound was performed on infants with positive screens (saturation <or=95% at >24 hours). Data regarding true and false positives as well as negatives were collected and analyzed.Oximetry was performed on 11 281 asymptomatic newborns, and 3 cases of CCVM were detected (total anomalous pulmonary venous return x2, truncus arteriosus). During the study interval, there were 9 live births of infants with CCVM from a group of 15 fetuses with CCVM detected by fetal echocardiography. Six infants with CCVM were symptomatic before screening. There was 1 false-positive screen. Two infants with negative screens were readmitted (coarctation, hypoplastic left pulmonary artery with aorto-pulmonary collaterals). Other cardiac diagnoses in the database search were nonurgent, including cases of patent foramen ovale, peripheral pulmonic stenosis, and ventricular septal defect. The prevalence of critical CCVM among all live births was 1 in 564 and among the screened population was 1 in 2256 (sensitivity: 60%; specificity: 99.95%; positive predictive value: 75%; negative predictive value: 99.98%; accuracy: 99.97%).This screening test is simple, noninvasive, and inexpensive and can be administered in conjunction with state-mandated screening. The false-negative screen patients had lesions not amenable to detection by oximetry. The sensitivity, specificity, and predictive value in this population are satisfactory, indicating that screening should be applied to larger populations, particularly where lower rates of fetal detection result in increased CCVM prevalence in asymptomatic newborns.Implementing Universal Pulse Oximetry Screening in West Virginia: Findings from Year One.In March 2012 the West Virginia legislature passed a law that mandates birth hospitals to perform pulse oximetry screening for all well-babies in the newborn nursery to improve the detection of critical congenital heart disease (CCHD). CCHD screening data collection began on September 1, 2012 at all 28 birthing hospitals. The purpose of this study was to review the first year of pulse oximetry screening outcomes and identify barriers to implementation and solutions to improve tracking and policy.All WV birth hospitals were provided with the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services recommendations for CCHD screening, and the Center for Disease Control's recommended screening algorithm for review and reference. 20,115 infants were entered into the Birth Score database between September 1, 2012 and August 31, 2013. 19,283 (91%) infants were screened for CCHD.17,101 (88.5%) infants passed, 19 infants failed, and 2,163 (11.2%) infants had missing data for the screening. 832 infants were not screened due to being admitted to the neonatal intensive care unit for reasons unknown. 17 of the 19 infants who failed the screening had a transthoracic echo report available for review. Of those 17 infants reviewed, seven were diagnosed with CCHD.85% of the infants born in WV who received a Birth Score during the year reviewed were screened for CCHD. Given that the goal is to have 100% compliance with the pulse oximetry screening, additional investigations into factors affecting compliance may be necessary.Newborn pulse oximetry screening to detect critical congenital heart disease.To describe current practice and clarify provider opinion in the US with regard to newborn pulse oximetry screening (NPOx) for critical congenital heart disease.An internet-based questionnaire was forwarded to general pediatricians, neonatologists, and family medicine physicians. Physicians were surveyed regarding involvement in newborn medicine, knowledge of NPOx recommendations, and opinions regarding screening. NPOx protocol specifics were also queried.Survey responses (n = 481) were received with 349 respondents involved in newborn medicine. Forty-nine percent (95% CI 44%-54%) of those involved in newborn medicine practice at a hospital with a NPOx protocol. Sixty-six percent of providers endorsed it as an effective tool, 20% required more education, 11% questioned its sensitivity, and 3% had no opinion. Sixty-five percent of providers were aware of recent state legislation mandating its use and 46% reported awareness of the addition of NPOx to the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel. Eighty-four percent of providers who practice at a hospital without a NPOx protocol were interested in its implementation. NPOx protocols varied and were not uniform with differences in time of test, location of probe, and values considered positive.NPOx has grown in its prevalence and acceptance in clinical practice, yet is far from universal in its application and design despite the recent American Academy of Pediatrics endorsement and its addition to the Recommended Uniform Screening Panel. The majority of physicians involved in newborn medicine deemed it an effective tool.Pulse oximetry as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease in term newborns.Pulse oximetry has been suggested as a screening test for congenital heart disease (CHD) in asymptomatic newborns. However, most newborns in Mexico are discharged from the hospital without this evaluation.To evaluate pulse oximetry as a screening test for critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) in term newborns.We conducted a cross-sectional study in term newborns between July 2010 and April 2011. Pulse oximetry was determined before hospital discharge; in case of post-ductal oxygen saturation < 95%, a Doppler echocardiogram was performed.From 1,037 newborns screened, two had CCHD, one had pulmonary atresia and ventricular septal defect, and one Ebstein´s anomaly. Minor CHD was present in 10 babies. The overall prevalence of CHD was 11.5 per 1000 live births, and the prevalence of CCHD was 3.9 per 1000 live births. For those with critical disease, pulse oximetry had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity 98.8%, positive predictive value 14.2%, negative predictive value 100%, and positive likelihood ratio of 86.2. In regression analysis, oxygen saturation, respiratory frequency, and postnatal age were related with CCHD.Pulse oximetry had a good sensitivity and specificity for the identification of critical congenital heart disease in term newborns. Low oxygen saturation, higher respiratory frequency, and early postnatal age were related with congenital heart disease.The contribution of pulse oximetry to the early detection of congenital heart disease in newborns.Approximately half of all newborns with congenital heart disease are asymptomatic in the first few days of life. Early detection of ductal-dependant cardiac malformations prior to ductal closure is, however, of significant clinical importance, as the treatment outcome is related to the time of diagnosis. Pulse oximetry has been proposed for early detection of congenital heart disease. The aims of the present study were: 1) to determine the effectiveness of a pulse-oximetric screening performed on the first day of life for the detection of congenital heart disease in otherwise healthy newborns and 2) to determine if a pulse-oximetric screening combined with clinical examination is superior in the diagnosis of congenital heart disease to clinical examination alone. This is a prospective, multi-centre study. Postductal pulse oximetry was performed between six and twelve hours of age in all newborns of greater than 35 weeks gestation. If pulse-oximetry-measured arterial oxygen saturation was less than 95%, echocardiography was performed. Pulse oximetry was performed in 3,262 newborns. Twenty-four infants (0.7%) had repeated saturations of less than 95%. Of these infants, 17 had congenital heart disease and five of the remaining seven had persistent pulmonary hypertension. No infant with a ductal-dependant or cyanotic congenital heart disease exhibited saturation values greater or equal to 95%.postductal pulse-oximetric screening in the first few days of life is an effective means for detecting cyanotic congenital heart disease in otherwise healthy newborns.Clinical examination and pulse oximetry as screening for congenital heart disease in low-risk newborn.To assess sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of the cardiovascular physical examination (CPE) and of pulse oximetry in screening for congenital heart diseases (CHD) in asymptomatic newborn when prenatal ultrasound evaluation is negative for structural cardiac abnormalities.In this observational cohort study, 5750 asymptomatic newborns, admitted to nursery in a period of 2 years, underwent to CPE and determination of arterial oxygen saturation by pulse oxymetry between 48th and 72nd h of life.Two hundred and ninty-eight newborns presented a suspected CPE; in 70% of cases, we found a transitional alteration and in only 17% of cases, the echocardiography examination performed for suspected CPE were completely negative. Three newborns were positive to pulse oximetry screening test but negative at CPE. After discharge, one case of critical CHD was diagnosed.An accurate CPE performed by trained and experienced pediatricians is indicative of important cardiac structural alteration in more than 25%. The association of CPE and pulse oximetry allows to further improve the diagnostic accuracy.Accuracy of pulse oximetry screening for detecting critical congenital heart disease in the newborns in rural hospital of Central India.Congenital cardiovascular malformations are the most common category of birth defects and responsible for mortality in the first twelve months of life. Critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) will be present in approximately one quarter of these children, which requires catheter or surgery intervention in the first year of life.To determine the accuracy of pulse oximetry for detecting clinically unrecognized CCHD in the newborns.Pulse oximetry was performed on clinically normal newborns within first 4 hours of life. If screening oxygen saturation (SpO2) was below 90%, echocardiography was then performed.All newborns who were admitted in postnatal ward & NICU.Out born babies and babies with a prenatal diagnosis of duct dependent circulation.Pulse-oximetric screening was performed on 2110 clinically normal newborns. Low SpO2 (<90%) was found in eight babies seven of them had CCHD, including three neonates with TGA, two with tricuspid atresia, one with tetralogy of fallot and one with transposition of great vessels. A pulse oximetry cut-off value of below 90% for detecting CCHD showed 100% sensitivity, 99.95% specificity, 87.50% positive predictive value, 100% negative predictive value.Pulse oximetry is safe, feasible and noninvasive, can be used as screening tool for detecting CCHD in clinically normal newborn. If SpO2 is below 90% in clinically normal newborns within 4 hours of birth, urgent echocardiography is suggested to rule out CCHD.Combining pulse oximetry and clinical examination in screening for congenital heart disease.The objective of this study was to evaluate combined pulse oximetry and clinical examination as a screening method for congenital heart disease (CHD) in asymptomatic newborns. Asymptomatic newborns were screened for CHD using pulse oximetry and clinical examination before their discharge from the nursery. Oxygen saturation > or =94% was considered normal. Echocardiography was done for newborns with abnormal readings and for those with significant murmurs. Data concerning undetected cases were collected from the pediatric referral hospital. A total of 5211 cases were screened. Echocardiographic evaluations were done based on low pulse oximetry in five cases and on murmur detection in ten others. The sensitivity of the combined method of screening was 77%, whereas it was 31% for oximetry alone and 46% for clinical examination alone. Specificity was approximately 100% for all methods. The positive predictive value of the combined tool was 66.7%. We conclude that combining pulse oximetry and clinical examination can enhance the clinician's ability to detect life-threatening CHD in a timely manner. This screening method should become a part of the discharge plan for every newborn.Smooth implementation of critical congenital heart defect screening in a newborn nursery.In January of 2012, University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences began implementation of a critical congenital heart disease screening program to identify newborns with structural heart defects. The screening used motion tolerant pulse oximeters in direct sequence to measure the oxygen levels in the right hand and either foot of eligible newborns. Exclusion criteria included echocardiogram prior to discharge, age greater than 7 days with continuous neonatal intensive care unit monitoring, or death or transfer prior to discharge. Of the 1905 infants screened, 3 infants failed screening. Two of the infants had atrial septal defects, and 1 had a patent foramen ovale, which was considered a false positive. After planning and education, the implementation of critical congenital heart disease pulse oximetry screening was successful. With only 1 false positive in our high-risk population, this should encourage other institutions to begin screening eligible infants. Pulse oximetry screening for clinically unrecognized critical congenital heart disease in the newborns.To determine the incidence of clinically unrecognized critical congenital heart disease (CCHD) in the newborns by using pulse oximetric screening.Pulse oximetry was performed on clinically normal newborns at 24-48 hours of age. If screening oxygen saturation (SpO(2)) was below 95%, echocardiography was then performed. Data regarding true and false positives as well as negatives were collected and analyzed.Pulse-oximetric screening was performed on 1847 clinically normal newborns. Low SpO2 (<95%) was found in three babies two of them had CCHD, including one with transposition of the great vessels, one with complete atrioventricular canal with moderate tricuspid regurgitation (sensitivity: 100%; specificity: 99.8%; positive predictive value: 100%; negative predictive value: 100%; accuracy: 99.8%).In addition to routine physical examination in the newborn infants pulse oximetry may improve the early diagnosis CCHD in the newborn. If oxygen saturation in clinically normal newborns is below 95% at 24-48 hours of age, referral to a cardiology unit is suggested.Neonatal screening for critical cardiovascular anomalies using pulse oximetry.Babies with cardiac anomalies are often asymptomatic at birth, and many remain undetected despite routine newborn examination. We retrospectively assessed the effect of routine pulse oximetry in detection of such anomalies from a hospital birth population of 31 946 babies born between 1 April 1999 and 31 March 2009.29 925 babies who were not admitted to the neonatal unit at birth underwent postductal oxygen saturation measurement before discharge. If saturation was below 95% an examination was performed. If this was abnormal or saturation remained low, an echocardiogram was performed. All babies with cardiac anomaly diagnosed before 1-year were identified from the region's fetal abnormality database.Critical anomalies affected 27 infants (1 in 1180); 10 identified prenatally, 2 after echocardiogram was performed because of other anomalies, 2 in preterm infants, 2 when symptomatic before screening, 5 by oximetry screening, 1 when symptomatic in hospital after a normal screen and 5 after discharge home. Serious anomalies affected 50 infants (1 in 640); 8 identified antenatally, 7 because of other anomalies, 3 in the neonatal unit, 5 by pulse oximetry screening, 11 by routine newborn examination, and 16 after discharge home.Routine pulse oximetry aided detection of 5/27 of critical and 5/50 of serious anomalies in this sample, but did not prevent five babies with critical and 15 with serious anomalies being discharged undiagnosed. Results from screening over 250 000 babies have now been published, but this total includes only 49 babies with transposition, and even smaller numbers of rarer anomalies.Pulse oximetry with clinical assessment to screen for congenital heart disease in neonates in China: a prospective study.Several pioneering studies have provided evidence for the introduction of universal pulse oximetry screening for critical congenital heart disease. However, whether the benefits of screening reported in studies from high-income countries would translate with similar success to low-income countries is unknown. We assessed the feasibility and reliability of pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment for detection of major congenital heart disease, especially critical congenital heart disease, in China.We did a pilot study at three hospitals in Shanghai to assess the accuracy of pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment for detection of congenital heart disease. We made a data collection plan before recruitment. We then undertook a large, prospective, and multicentre screening study in which we screened all consecutive newborn babies (aged 6-72 h) born at 18 hospitals in China between Aug 1, 2011, and Nov 30, 2012. Newborn babies with positive screen results (either an abnormal pulse oximetry or abnormal clinical assessment) were referred for echocardiography within 24 h of screening. We identified false-negative results by clinical follow-up and parents' feedback. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and positive and negative likelihood ratios for pulse oximetry alone, and in combination with clinical assessment, for detection of major and critical congenital heart disease.In the pilot study, 6785 consecutive newborn babies were screened; 46 of 49 (94%) cases of asymptomatic major congenital heart disease and eight of eight (100%) cases of asymptomatic critical disease were detected by pulse oximetry and clinical assessment. In the prospective multicentre study, we screened 122,738 consecutive newborn babies (120,707 asymptomatic and 2031 symptomatic), and detected congenital heart disease in 1071 (157 critical and 330 major). In asymptomatic newborn babies, the sensitivity of pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment was 93·2% (95% CI 87·9-96·2) for critical congenital heart disease and 90·2% (86·4-93·0) for major disease. The addition of pulse oximetry to clinical assessment improved sensitivity for detection of critical congenital heart disease from 77·4% (95% CI 70·0-83·4) to 93·2% (87·9-96·2). The false-positive rate for detection of critical disease was 2·7% (3298 of 120,392) for clinical assessment alone and 0·3% (394 of 120,561) for pulse oximetry alone.Pulse oximetry plus clinical assessment is feasible and reliable for the detection of major congenital heart disease in newborn babies in China. This simple and accurate combined method should be used in maternity hospitals to screen for congenital heart disease.Key Clinical Research Project sponsored by Ministry of Health, Shanghai Public Health Three-Year Action Plan sponsored by Shanghai Municipal Government, and National Basic Research Project of China.Modern Strategy for Identification of Congenital Heart Defects in the Neonatal Period.Congenital heart defects are the most common congenital anomalies and occur with an incidence from 0.8 to 1% per 1000 live births. In recent years, the pulse oximetry has become a strong candidate for detecting cyanogen congenital heart defects and in combination with routine clinical exam can improve diagnostic of congenital heart diseases.To apply the modern algorithm for early detection of congenital heart defects in order to improve the diagnosis in the neonatal period.This was a prospective study that included children born in Bihac Cantonal Hospital during 2012. The diagnostic algorithm included a clinical examination of the newborn, measuring of transcutaneous oxygen saturation with the pulse oximeter between 24 and 48 hours of life, and, in some cases, additional tests (cardiac ultrasound).A total of 1,865 children were examined. The application of diagnostic protocol identified the existence of congenital heart defects in 29 children. In re-evaluating the auscultator and ultrasound findings, we identified congenital heart defects in 19 children.The application of the modern algorithm for early detection of congenital heart diseases in the neonatal period can significantly improve the making of diagnosis of these anomalies. The concept is simple, inexpensive and applicable in most maternity wards.